NASA  FY  2008  BUDGET

S.  HRG.  110–49

HEARING

BEFORE THE

SUBCOMMITTEE ON SPACE, AERONAUTICS, AND 

RELATED SCIENCES

OF THE

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

FEBRUARY  28,  2007

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation

(

34–851 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2007

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2250 Mail: Stop SSOP, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:31 Jun 08, 2007 Jkt 034851 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34851.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Vice  Chairman 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

MARGARET SPRING,  Democratic  General  Counsel 
LISA J.  SUTHERLAND,  Republican  Staff  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director 

KENNETH R.  NAHIGIAN,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  SPACE,  AERONAUTICS,  AND  RELATED  SCIENCES 

BILL  NELSON,  Florida,  Chairman 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 

KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas,  Ranking 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 

(II)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:31 Jun 08, 2007 Jkt 034851 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34851.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on February 28, 2007 .......................................................................
Statement of Senator Dorgan .................................................................................
Statement of Senator Hutchison ............................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Statement of Senator Nelson ..................................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Statement of Senator Stevens ................................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................

Page 
1
23
3
4
1
2
5
5

Griffin, Dr. Michael D., Administrator, NASA ......................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................

6
8

WITNESSES 

Inouye, Hon. Daniel K., U.S. Senator from Hawaii, prepared statement ...........

41 

APPENDIX 

(III)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:31 Jun 08, 2007 Jkt 034851 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34851.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:31 Jun 08, 2007 Jkt 034851 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34851.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

NASA  FY  2008  BUDGET 

WEDNESDAY,  FEBRUARY  28,  2007

SUBCOMMITTEE ON SPACE, AERONAUTICS, AND RELATED 
SCIENCES, 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

The  Subcommittee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  2:36  p.m.  in  room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Bill  Nelson,
Chairman of the Subcommittee, presiding. 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. BILL NELSON,

U.S. SENATOR FROM FLORIDA 

Senator NELSON. Well, good afternoon. It’s been a long time since 
I  chaired  one  of  these  Space  Subcommittee  hearings.  I  was  Chair-
man  from  1985  to  1990  of  the  Space  Subcommittee  of  the  House 
of  Representatives.  There  are  actually  a  few  faces  out  there  in  the 
audience that were around at that time. So, thank you all for hang-
ing in there. 

I  want  to  take  the  occasion  of  introducing  you  all  to  our  Shuttle 
crew  that  flew  in  December,  Commander  Mark  Polansky  and  Mis-
sion  Specialists  Robert  Curbeam,  Joan  Higginbotham,  Nicholas 
Patrick,  and  Christer  Fuglesang.  They  had  a  terrific  mission  so, 
let’s all welcome them to Washington. 

[Applause.] 
Senator  NELSON.  You  all  do  us  proud.  And,  oh,  boy,  every  time 
I see that Shuttle come back—it’s just amazing, Mark, how you can 
just  put  it  on  a  dime,  and  you  don’t  have  an  engine.  The  only  cor-
rection you have is in that vertical stabilizer, where you’ve got that 
speed brake. Other than that, it’s your pure native talent that puts 
it  down.  And  folks  like  Mark  put  it  on  a  dime  every  time,  coming 
back  from  a  point  way  out  in  space.  So,  thank  you  for  your  exper-
tise. Thank all of you for coming and visiting with us today. 

We welcome Dr. Griffin. Senator Hutchison will be here momen-
tarily. What I’d like you to do, Dr. Griffin, rather than hold up, I’d 
like us to go on. We’re going to put your written testimony into the 
record. 

Oh, here is Senator Hutchison. 
What  I’d  like  you  to  do,  instead  of  reading  your  testimony,  just 
talk to us, like you would when you come in to visit us in the office. 
Then we’ll get into a dialogue in Q&A, later on. 

So,  Dr.  Griffin,  thank  you  for  the  leadership  that  you  are  offer-
ing,  and  for  how  you  have  turned  the  agency  around.  Thank  you 
for tackling tough issues, like Hubble, and how you put 10 pounds 

(1)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:31 Jun 08, 2007 Jkt 034851 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34851.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

2

of potatoes into a 5-pound sack. Thank you for the team that you’re 
leading, which included a Nobel winner this year, Dr. John Mather, 
who won the Nobel Prize in Physics. And thank you for getting us 
back  into  space,  and  doing  it  not  once  now  but  twice,  with  human 
missions. 

If  the  crew  would  like  to  sit  up  here  at  the  Committee  table, 
please.  No,  come  on  up  here.  Look,  I’m  running  the  show.  I  have 
the authority to do this now. 

[Laughter.] 
Dr.  GRIFFIN.  Well,  and  for  my  part,  I’m  happy  to  let  Roman  do 

the hearing, too. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator NELSON. Well, he may be gone by that time. 
Thank  you,  also,  Dr.  Griffin,  as  you  try  to  keep  that  gap  nar-
rowed  between  the  time  that  we  have  to  shut  down  the  Space 
Shuttle and when we fly the new Crew Exploration Vehicle. Thank 
you, also, in an uncertain budget year, where we haven’t had budg-
ets submitted by the White House that have matched with the au-
thorization.  We  didn’t  even  pass  an  appropriations  bill  last  year. 
They  went  to  something  known  as  a  continuing  resolution  or  CR. 
And,  thanks  to  Senator  Hutchison  and  to  Senator  Barbara  Mikul-
ski,  they  had  added  another  billion  dollars,  over  and  above  the 
White House request, in the bill that was passed out of the Senate 
Appropriations  Committee.  And  then,  at  the  end  of  the  year  last 
year, we never could get the leadership to agree to take up the ap-
propriations  bill,  so  they  did  this  pared-down  thing,  called  a  Con-
tinuing Resolution, and that just adds to your headaches. 

We’re  looking  forward  to  having  your  testimony.  Again,  your 
statement will be put in the record. If you will just talk informally 
with us, I would appreciate it. 

[The prepared statement of Senator Nelson follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. BILL NELSON, U.S. SENATOR FROM FLORIDA 

Good afternoon and welcome to this hearing on NASA’s 2008 budget request. We 
welcome  as  our  witness  today  NASA’s  Administrator,  Dr.  Michael  Griffin,  and  ex-
tend a special welcome to the crew of STS–116 who are here visiting this afternoon. 
In December, Commander Mark Polansky and Mission Specialists Robert Curbeam, 
Joan  Higginbotham,  Nicholas  Patrick,  and  Christer  Fuglesang  successfully  com-
pleted the latest construction mission to the International Space Station. This crew 
conducted  four  spacewalks  and  installed  the  Station’s  permanent  power  system. 
Congratulations on your success and thank you for being here today. 

Since the last time we gathered to hear from Dr. Griffin in this forum, NASA has 
safely  flown  three  Shuttle  missions,  bringing  the  International  Space  Station  to  60 
percent complete and restoring America’s confidence in the Space Shuttle Program. 
NASA has successfully launched five science missions that will lead to better under-
standing  of  our  home  planet,  our  solar  system,  and  the  universe  beyond.  A  NASA 
scientist,  Dr.  John  Mather,  was  awarded  the  Nobel  Prize  in  Physics  this  year,  and 
the  transition  is  underway  to  replace  the  Shuttle  with  the  Orion  Crew  Exploration 
Vehicle and Ares Crew Launch Vehicle. 

With  the  successes  of  the  past  year  in  mind,  we  are  also  aware  of  the  challenges 
NASA  faces  in  the  future.  First,  it  must  safely  complete  the  International  Space 
Station and the remaining Shuttle flights. NASA must develop a new vehicle to take 
humans  to  the  Space  Station,  the  moon,  and  beyond—and  do  so  with  the  shortest 
possible  gap  between  the  Shuttle  and  Orion/Ares  programs.  And,  NASA  must  con-
tinue  implementation  of  a  balanced  program  of  exploration,  science,  and  aero-
nautics.  This  is  an  ambitious  agenda  that  was  accepted  by  this  Committee  and  the 
Congress,  in  a  bipartisan  way,  when  we  passed  the  NASA  Authorization  Act  of 
2005. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:31 Jun 08, 2007 Jkt 034851 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34851.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

3

However,  in  each  year  since,  the  White  House  has  requested  less  funding  for 
NASA than authorized by that Act. For that reason, and due to the continuing reso-
lution  for  this  fiscal  year,  NASA  will  receive  $1.7  billion  less  than  authorized  in 
2007. If the President’s 2008 budget is adopted, NASA will have received three bil-
lion  dollars  less  than  the  amount  planned  under  the  two-year  authorization  Act. 
These  shortfalls  are  in  addition  to  the  $2  billion  that  this  little  agency  had  to  take 
from  other  programs  to  recover  from  the  tragedy  of  the  Columbia  accident  and  re-
turn  the  Shuttle  to  flight.  If  we  continue  on  the  President’s  path,  we  face  an  ex-
tended  period  when  the  United  States  will  have  no  human  access  to  space.  I  say 
this is unacceptable—especially at a time when other nations are aggressively devel-
oping  space  technology.  Last  month’s  reckless  anti-satellite  test  by  the  Chinese  re-
minds  us  that  we  cannot  afford  to  remain  Earth-bound  while  others  pursue  space 
capabilities with questionable intent. 

And so Dr. Griffin, we’ve invited you to tell us today about the challenges you face 
implementing NASA’s program in this budget environment. We will also be looking 
into  steps  we  in  the  Congress  can  take  to  help  you  meet  some  of  those  challenges, 
and I look forward to working with you to see if, together, we can find some helpful 
answers.  Thank  you  for  your  presence  here  today,  and  I  look  forward  to  hearing 
your testimony.

Senator NELSON. Senator Hutchison? 

STATEMENT OF HON. KAY BAILEY HUTCHISON,

U.S. SENATOR FROM TEXAS 

Senator  HUTCHISON.  Well,  thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  And  I  am 

very glad that we are having this hearing. 

I will say, having been Chairman of this Subcommittee last year, 
and  having  Senator  Nelson  as  the  Ranking  Member,  that  I  can’t 
see  that  there  is  one  iota  of  difference  in  our  goals  for  NASA.  He 
was so helpful to me last year, and the year before that, in passing 
the reauthorization of NASA, which did, certainly, solidify our posi-
tion  that  we  wanted  the  Space  Station  to  be  finished,  that  we 
wanted good science to come out of the Space Station, and that we 
wanted  a  very  small  window—in  fact,  Senator  Nelson  and  I  tried 
to  make  it  ‘‘no  window’’—but,  working  with  you,  Dr.  Griffin,  we 
came up with a very small window for the time that we would not 
have a Shuttle and would not yet have the Crew Exploration Vehi-
cle. 

But  I  think  it  is  fair  to  say  that  Senator  Nelson  and  I  will  con-
tinue  to  work  in  tandem  to  try  to  assure  that  that  window  is  very 
small, which I know you agree with, but the budget is an issue. 

So,  I  want  to  have  the  designation  of  the  Space  Station  as  the 
National  Lab  mean  something.  I  think  it  is  a  very  important,  cre-
ative  way  for  us  to  add  funds  to  that  scientific  base  of  the  Space 
Station.  And  I  think  that  we  are  going  to  work  with  Senator  Ste-
vens  and  Senator  Inouye,  who  are  also  very  strong  supporters  of 
NASA,  and  Senator  Mikulski,  who  has  been  a  champion,  to  try  to 
increase  the  funding  that  we  see,  either  in  the  supplemental  or  in 
this 2008 budget. 

The  2008  budget  looks  very  strong,  a  3.1  percent  increase,  but 
when  you  look  at  what  happened  last  year  with  the  flat  funding, 
it  still  leaves  us  short  of  being  able  to  achieve  the  goals  that  we 
have,  which  are  ‘‘no  window’’  and  humans  being  able  to  go  into 
space, and also real science being able to be done on the Space Sta-
tion, which means finishing it properly. 

I  visited  with  the  crew  earlier,  and  was  so  impressed  with  the 
job  they  did  of  configuring  the  Space  Station,  and  trying  to  make 
sure  that  it  is  going  to  be  viable  and  have  everything  that  we  can 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:31 Jun 08, 2007 Jkt 034851 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34851.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

4

have  working  on  it.  So,  we’re  glad  that  you’re  here  and  that  we 
have an international component to the team. And, as I said to you 
earlier today, Senator Nelson and I are a bipartisan team. We have 
the  Chairman  and  Ranking  Member  of  the  full  Committee  also  in 
absolute  sync  that  we  want  NASA  to  be  the  great  treasure  that  it 
has been to our country in innovation, in defense leadership, secu-
rity leadership, and also we want to make sure that it can support 
the  scientific  achievements  that  can  keep  the  quality  of  life  in  our 
country and our world on the continuing rise. 

So,  thank  you  for  what  you’re  doing.  We’ve  certainly  visited  a 
number  of  times,  and  I  hope  that  we  will  continue  to  be  able  to 
fund  you,  and  that  you  will  continue  to  be  able  to  have  the  means 
to accomplish the priorities that we share. Thank you. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Senator Hutchison follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. KAY BAILEY HUTCHISON, U.S. SENATOR FROM TEXAS 
Thank you, Mr. Chairman, for beginning the hearings under your leadership with 
this important discussion of NASA’s FY 2008 budget request. I have always enjoyed 
our  very  strong  and  bipartisan  working  relationship,  and  look  forward  to  working 
with  you  and  your  staff  as  we  move  forward  with  the  work  of  the  Subcommittee. 
I  also  join  you  in  welcoming  the  STS–116  crew  to  our  hearing  room  today.  I  had 
the opportunity to visit with them briefly in my office earlier today, and, as always, 
am impressed with their enthusiasm and dedication to their missions and the vital 
and important role of human spaceflight and exploration. 

This  crew  performed  an  extremely  complex  mission—perhaps  the  most  complex 
one to date—and did it successfully and made it look easy. They literally began the 
process  of  bringing  the  backbone  of  the  Space  Station  to  life  in  preparation  for  the 
great promise of scientific research that lies ahead. 

Thank  you,  Dr.  Griffin.  for  joining  us  today  to  outline  the  President’s  FY  2008 

budget request for NASA. 

On  the  face  of  it,  the  request  is  a  good  budget,  with  a  3.1  percent  increase  over 

what had been requested for FY 2007. 

However,  as  we  all  know,  NASA  did  not  receive  the  amount  it  requested  in  FY 
2007—in  fact,  it  has  been,  for  all  intents  and  purposes,  held  flat  in  FY  2007  with 
an appropriations level based on the amount it received in FY 2006. 

That outcome, of course, was not known when this budget request was developed. 
The result is, however, that this budget request, in the context of the FY 2007 Con-
tinuing  Resolution,  is  not  an  adequate  budget  and  will  not,  by  itself,  allow  NASA 
to move forward effectively with its plans for the future. 

A  little  over  a  year  ago,  the  Congress  passed  legislation,  authored  by  this  Sub-
committee,  authorizing  NASA  funding  for  FY  2007  and  2008.  For  FY  2007,  we  au-
thorized  $17.9  billion;  for  FY  2008,  we  authorized  $18.7  billion.  The  amount  appro-
priated  for  FY  2007  was  $16.2  billion;  the  amount  requested  for  FY  2008  is  $17.3 
billion.  A  combined  total  of  $3.1  billion  less  for  those  2  years  than  we  authorized. 
As  you  know,  Mr.  Chairman,  we  did  not  pick  those  authorization  numbers  out  of 
a  hat.  We—and  our  House  counterparts—determined  those  were  the  appropriate 
numbers to ensure a healthy and balanced NASA budget that could effectively meet 
the challenges it was facing then—and continues to face now. 

I am disappointed that the appropriations for FY 2007 were so far below even the 
amount  requested.  I  am  equally  disappointed  that  the  White  House  has  not  seen 
fit  to  request  amounts  even  close  to  what  we  authorized.  I  believe  those  decisions 
have  forced  Dr.  Griffin  to  make  the  kinds  of  painful  choices  we  are  hearing  about 
from the scientific community. 

I am further concerned that being forced to make those choices can have the effect 
of  undermining  the  traditional  constituency  for  NASA  that  is  vital  for  this  Nation 
to sustain an aggressive and viable space exploration program. 

What  is  also  becoming  more  and  more  certain,  as  we  look  at  the  world  around 
us,  is  that  if  the  U.S.  does  not  sustain  an  active  space  exploration  program,  other 
nations will—and are preparing to—step into that vacuum. 

The challenges are great, and the stakes are high, Mr. Chairman, and I look for-
ward to working with you to find the right kinds of answers to meet them and keep 
our Nation at the forefront of space exploration.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:31 Jun 08, 2007 Jkt 034851 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34851.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

5

Senator  NELSON.  Senator  Stevens,  we’re  honored  to  have  you 

here today. 

STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS,

U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

Senator  STEVENS.  Well,  thank  you  very  much.  I  would  like  to 

have my opening statement submitted. 

I’m delighted to see the members of the crew that are here. And 
we  were  very  pleased  to  have  an  Alaskan,  Commander  Bill 
Oefelein as the Pilot of the recent mission. 

So,  I  don’t  want  to  prolong  it.  I’m  here  to  hear  Dr.  Griffin  and 

go on to another meeting. So, I appreciate your courtesy. 

[The prepared statement of Senator Stevens follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman, for holding this important hearing on NASA’s FY 2008 
budget request. NASA has an important role to play in helping this Nation expand 
its  technological  edge  and  conducting  exciting  exploration  into  the  heavens—and  in 
better understanding our own Earth. 

I  am  also  delighted  to  see  some  of  the  crew  members  of  the  most  recent  Space 
Shuttle  mission—STS–116—join  the  Administrator  briefly  at  this  hearing,  led  by 
their Commander, Mark Polansky. 

Their  mission  was  extremely  successful  and  marked  an  important  turning  point 
in  assembling  the  International  Space  Station  by  getting  its  permanent  power  sys-
tem  ready  to  receive  the  research  laboratories  of  our  international  partners,  and 
come  closer  to  being  the  great  scientific  laboratory  we  have  always  intended  it  to 
be. 

Of course, I am always pleased when an Alaskan native is able to play a key role 
in a mission, as did Astronaut and Navy Commander Bill Oefelein, the Pilot for this 
mission,  who  is  from  Anchorage.  I  am  sorry  that  he  had  a  scheduling  conflict  and 
could not be here with you today, but I want to congratulate all of you on your fine 
service and dedication to space exploration. 

The NASA budget request reflects the continued support of the Administration for 
NASA.  In  a  very  constrained  budget,  the  President  has  recommended  a  little  over 
3 percent increase over what was requested for FY 2007. 

As  it  happened,  the  amount  appropriated  in  the  year-long  Continuing  Resolution 
did not get approved, and so there will have to be some adjustments to the request, 
which I understand Dr. Griffin will be providing to the Congress in the near future. 
I  believe  we  need  a  strong  commitment  to  NASA  and  its  programs,  and  I  hope 
we  can  find  the  best  means  of  providing  the  resources  to  allow  the  agency  to  carry 
out all its objectives. 

One  area  I  am  especially  interested  in  is  the  research  NASA  is  doing  to  help  us 

understand the question of the causes and effects of global climate change. 

This  is  an  area  of  particular  interest  to  Alaska,  where  we  feel  the  impacts  of 

many environmental changes sooner than much of the rest of the world. 

There are complex relationships between such forces as ocean surface changes and 
temperature variations and air currents bringing warmer precipitation to places like 
Alaska, where the permafrost is affected, and causing increased release of methane 
gases, which in turn affects the ozone layer. 

We need to understand these forces, and I will be interested to hear how NASA’s 

Earth Science programs can help increase that understanding. 

I look forward to your testimony, Dr. Griffin, and working with the Chairman and 
Ranking  Member  of  this  Subcommittee  and  the  Chairman  of  the  full  Committee  in 
charting a solid future for NASA.

Senator NELSON. Yes, thank you, Senator Stevens. 
Dr. Griffin, one of the things that you might also comment on is 
this  Chinese  ASAT  test  that  has  put  a  huge  debris  field  in  space, 
which is probably—all of the debris that’s up there, it’s a huge per-
centage in addition, as a result of that ASAT test, and it’s up there 
at about 500 miles, which means it’s going to be a long time coming 
down.  It  is  not  only  a  threat  to  our  meteorological  and  other  sat-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:31 Jun 08, 2007 Jkt 034851 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34851.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

6

ellites, but also a threat to the Space Station. So, at your pleasure, 
if you will share with us. 

STATEMENT OF DR. MICHAEL D. GRIFFIN, ADMINISTRATOR, 

NASA 

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  Mr.  Chairman,  Ranking  Member  Hutchison,  and 
Mr. Vice Chairman, Senator Stevens, thank you for being here. It’s 
always a pleasure to appear before you. 

As you have all noted, we have goals in common. There is no dif-
ference  between  what  you  want  and  what  we  want.  In  fact,  I  ask 
your support, not really so much on behalf of NASA, but on behalf 
of the American space program and our mutual goal to be a leader 
in  forging  a  spacefaring  civilization.  That  is  what  we  are  about. 
That is what the vision is about. 

This  year,  above  all  years,  we  need  your  help.  This  is  a  Fiscal 
Year  2008  budget  request.  I  can  only  say,  at  the  outset—you’ve 
asked  me  not  to  read  my  statement;  I  won’t.  I  will  make  a  few 
points from it, if you don’t mind, as if we were just talking in your 
office. 

We  accept  the  will  of  the  Congress  on  the  Fiscal  Year  2007  con-
tinuing  resolution,  but  it  causes  us  a  lot  of  pain.  I  will  describe 
some of that. It is imperative that we have the full request for Fis-
cal  Year  2008  if  we  are  not  to  do  great  and  lasting  damage  to  the 
program. We need your help with that. 

In  fact,  this  Committee  demonstrated  enormous  leadership  in 
crafting  the  2005  Authorization  Act  which  sets  the  course  for 
NASA  and  our  country  to  go  out  again  beyond  low  Earth  orbit,  to 
explore  the  Moon,  Mars,  the  near-Earth  asteroids,  and  to  learn  to 
utilize  space  for  our  benefit,  building  on  the  legacy  of  the  Inter-
national Space Station. 

Last  year,  the  budget  I  brought  you  recognized  the  changes  we 
had made since the earlier years; in particular, prior to the loss of 
Space  Shuttle  Columbia.  This  year’s  budget  contains  no  surprises. 
It  continues  on  exactly  in  the  tradition  that  we  laid  out  for  the 
FY07  budget,  which,  unfortunately,  was  not  passed.  But  if  you 
studied that budget—and I know you did—you will see no surprises 
this year. 

Last  year,  we  actually  carried  out,  sir,  three  Shuttle  missions, 
and  the  fourth  since  I  assumed  office.  All  of  those  have  been  very 
successful. We had a bit of difficulty returning the Shuttle to flight, 
dealing with external tank debris. I’m happy to report that we now 
have  a  much  greater  understanding  of  that  problem  than  in  the 
years before we lost Columbia, and our last three flights have been 
conducted  with  near-historic  minimums  of  debris  problems  from 
the external tank. 

As  you  know,  because  you  just  introduced  them,  we  have  here 
most  of  the  crew  from  our  December  mission.  Up  until  yesterday, 
we  were  looking  forward  to  the  March  launch  of  Shuttle  Atlantis, 
with Rick Sturckow, Marine colonel, commanding. That launch will 
now  likely  be  toward  the  end  of  April,  at  the  opening  of  the  next 
window,  because  we  had  a  major  hail  storm  in  Florida.  Senator, 
I’m  surprised,  being  from  Florida,  that  you’ve  not  managed  to  get 
a  handle  on  those  hail  storms.  But  we  had  some  damage  to  the 
tank, and we’re going to have to roll back. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:31 Jun 08, 2007 Jkt 034851 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34851.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

7

By March 15th, I will present to this Committee, and, in fact, to 
the  Congress,  an  operating  plan  outlining  how  we  intend  to  cope 
with  the  reduction  in  the  planned  amount  for  Fiscal  Year  2007. 
The reduction, I will tell you now, does not halt any planned work 
that  we  were  going  to  do  on  the  Crew  Exploration  Vehicle  (CEV) 
or  the  Crew  Launch  Vehicle  (CLV),  the  Orion  and  Ares.  It  does 
stretch  it  out.  I  know  that  you  will  want  me  to  tell  you  how  much 
of  a  stretch  out.  Our  funding  was  extremely  limited,  as  you  know, 
coming  in,  and  we  were  fighting  to  hold  a  renewed  human 
spaceflight capability in 2014, the last year mandated by the Presi-
dent  to  do  so.  Regrettably,  I  am  projecting  a  4-  to  6-month  slip  in 
our launch dates, our first launch date for the Orion and Ares, and 
I think we can expect them to slip into early 2015. 

We  are  working,  as  we  speak,  to  prioritize  all  of  our  funding  at 
NASA  and  to  orient  all  of  it  that  we  can  toward  the  replacement 
of  the  Shuttle.  But  I  am  afraid  that  I  do  not  have  good  news  for 
you  in  that  regard,  particularly  with  your  concern  for  minimizing 
the gap in human spaceflight. 

We  have  deferred  a  great  deal  of  the  research  on  the  Inter-
national Space Station. If I have to prioritize, then I must prioritize 
completion of the International Space Station over utilization of the 
International Space Station. If I have to prioritize, I must prioritize 
access  to  the  International  Space  Station  over  utilization  of  the 
International  Space  Station.  So,  we  have  deferred  some  research. 
Despite that, we are aggressively, Senator Hutchison, seeking co-
operation  with  other  government  agencies  and  with  industry  for 
the  utilization  of  the  National  Laboratory,  the  U.S.  Laboratory,  on 
the  International  Space  Station.  Progress  in  that  arena  was  going 
quite  well,  actually,  until  we  lost  Columbia.  As  you  might  antici-
pate,  it  dried  up  substantially  at  that  time.  We  are  now  under-
taking  a  renewed  effort  to  make  full  and  complete  use  of  the  Sta-
tion, but it will have to await other priorities that I spoke of. 

The biggest concern that I have is that we hold to the vision that 
was outlined in the months right after we lost Columbia. And here, 
sir, I would like to read a quote from the Columbia Accident Inves-
tigation Board (CAIB). 

The  CAIB  noted  that  ‘‘the  U.S.  space  effort  has  moved  forward 
for more than 30 years without a guiding vision.’’ I want to thank, 
explicitly,  you,  Senator  Hutchison,  Senator  Stevens,  for  bringing 
your  leadership  to  bear  on  this  issue  with  our  2005  Authorization 
Act. It makes the law of the land exactly the right thing. 

The  CAIB  went  on  to  observe,  ‘‘Because  the  Shuttle  is  now  an 
aging  system,  but  still  developmental  in  character,  it  is  in  the  Na-
tion’s interest to replace the Shuttle as soon as possible as the pri-
mary  means  for  transporting  humans  to  and  from  Earth  orbit.’’ 
Continuing on, quoting again, ‘‘The previous attempts to develop a 
replacement vehicle for the aging Shuttle represent a failure of na-
tional leadership.’’

Finally,  the  Board  noted  that,  ‘‘This  approach  can  only  be  suc-
cessful  if  it  is  sustained  over  the  decade,  if,  by  the  time  a  decision 
is made to develop a new vehicle, there is a clearer idea of how the 
new  transportation  fits  into  the  Nation’s  overall  plans  for  space, 
and  if  the  U.S.  Government  is  willing,  at  the  time  a  development 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:31 Jun 08, 2007 Jkt 034851 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34851.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

8

decision  is  made,  to  commit  the  resources  required  to  implement 
it.’’

Now,  you  in  this  Congress  and  this  President  have  removed  the 
issues of lack of strategic vision. We have made a development de-
cision based on an architecture. Our new crew vehicle fits into the 
larger  architecture  of  human  lunar  return  and  later  voyages  to 
Mars.  We  have  taken  care  of  the  major  issues.  We  must  take  care 
now to sustain the commitment of resources necessary to finish the 
development,  or  we  will  fail  to  heed  the  lessons  that  were,  I  hope, 
learned in the aftermath of Columbia. 

I  want  to  conclude  by  noting  that  human  spaceflight  is  a  stra-
tegic  asset  for  our  Nation.  It  should  not  again  be  risked  as  we 
risked  it  during  the  6-year  gap  between  the  end  of  Apollo  and  the 
onset of Shuttle. We must have a safe and orderly transition, both 
for  the  expert  manpower  that  sustains  this  effort  and  for  the  posi-
tion  of  the  United  States  as  the  preeminent  spacefaring  nation  of 
the  world.  By  the  time  we  retire  the  Shuttle  and  resume  flights 
with  our  Orion  and  Ares  systems,  several  other  nations  will  have 
joined us in space with their own capability. For the United States 
not to be among them is tragic. 

In  our  science  portfolio,  our  request  for  Fiscal  Year  2008  is  for 
five and a half billion dollars. It maintains a balanced approach to 
our  portfolio  of  four  basic  areas:  astrophysics,  planetary  science, 
Earth  science,  and  heliophysics.  In  aeronautics,  our  FY08  budget 
puts  forth  a  stable  plan  for  the  next  5  years,  without  major  in-
creases, and certainly no decreases, allowing us to capitalize on the 
strategic  vision  that  we  developed  last  year  at  the  behest  of  this 
Congress,  and  which  was  honored  by  an  executive  order  from  the 
President. So, we now have a new aeronautic strategic plan. I hope 
that you will see, and this Congress will see, the value in this plan 
that I see. I look forward to implementing it. 

In  closing,  Chairman  Nelson,  I’d  like  to  finish  with  a  concern 
that  I’ve  raised  in  recent  speeches.  I  think  this  concern  needs  a 
wider audience. I’ve reached the point where I believe that if NASA 
were  to  disappear  tomorrow,  if  the  space  program  were  to  dis-
appear, if we never put another human into space, if we never put 
up  another  Hubble,  never  sent  another  spacecraft  to  another  plan-
et,  Americans  would  be  profoundly  distraught.  We  would  feel  less 
than  ourselves.  We  would  feel  that  our  best  days  were  behind  us, 
that our best days were consigned to the history books. 

As  you  know  better  than  most,  NASA’s  mission  leverages  a 
broader  American  way  of  life  that  speaks  to  the  best  in  us  and  to 
the  best  for  our  position  in  the  world.  We  need  your  help  in  sus-
taining it. 

We must not take for granted the leadership that we’ve had sim-
ply because our predecessors did great things. We must sustain the 
doing of great things, and I need your help in that. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Dr. Griffin follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DR. MICHAEL D. GRIFFIN, ADMINISTRATOR, NASA 

Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Subcommittee,  thank  you  for  the  opportunity 
to  appear  today  to  discuss  the  President’s  FY  2008  budget  request  for  NASA.  The 
President’s FY 2008 budget request for NASA is $17.3 billion. This represents a 3.1 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:31 Jun 08, 2007 Jkt 034851 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34851.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

9

percent  increase  over  the  FY  2007  request  for  the  agency,  but  not  the  enacted  FY 
2007 appropriation. The FY 2008 budget request for NASA demonstrates the Presi-
dent’s  continued  commitment  to  our  Nation’s  leadership  in  space  and  aeronautics 
research, especially during a time when there are other competing demands for our 
Nation’s  resources.  The  FY  2008  budget  request  reflects  a  stable  plan  to  continue 
investments begun in prior years, with some slight course corrections. Overall, I be-
lieve  that  we  are  heading  in  the  right  direction.  We  have  made  great  strides  this 
past year, and NASA is on track and making progress in carrying out the tasks be-
fore us. 

Before I outline the FY 2008 budget request for NASA any further, in the invita-
tion  to  testify  today  you  asked  that  I  address  current  NASA  plans  for  the  use  of 
FY 2007 funding. On February 15, 2007, the President signed into law a joint reso-
lution stipulating FY 2007 funding levels for NASA and other Federal agencies. This 
appropriation  reduces  overall  funding  for  NASA  by  $545  million  from  the  Presi-
dent’s  FY  2007  request.  The  FY  2008  budget  request  could  not  possibly  factor  the 
impact  of  such  a  funding  reduction  from  FY  2007  appropriation  for  NASA’s  care-
fully-considered  multi-year  programs,  and  thus,  several  programs  in  the  FY  2008 
budget request will be impacted. The FY 2007 appropriation further directs specific 
reductions  to  human  spaceflight  of  $677  million—$577  million  of  that  from  Explo-
ration Systems. This reduction may significantly impact our ability to safely and ef-
fectively transition from the Shuttle to the Orion Crew Exploration Vehicle and Ares 
I  Crew  Launch  Vehicle.  It  will  have  serious  effects  on  many  people,  projects,  and 
programs this year, and for the longer term. As I noted during last year’s Congres-
sional  hearings  on  NASA’s  FY  2007  budget  request,  we  have  a  carefully  balanced 
set  of  priorities  to  execute  on  behalf  of  our  Nation.  So  as  a  result  of  these  funding 
reductions  in  FY  2007,  NASA  is  carefully  assessing  the  implications  to  overall  Ex-
ploration  priorities  and  milestones,  and  will  present  detailed  impacts  after  a  full 
analysis  is  complete.  The  initial  NASA  Operating  Plan  for  FY  2007,  which  will  be 
finalized by March 15, will reflect the impacts of these reductions and the requisite 
decisions.  As  always,  we  are  here  to  carry  out  our  Nation’s  civil  space  and  aero-
nautics programs with the resources made available by the Congress. All of our pro-
grams  proceed  in  a  ‘‘go-as-we-can-afford-to-pay’’  manner;  so  if  we  receive  less  fund-
ing than requested, we will adjust our pace. Our stakeholders have my commitment 
to continue to keep them informed as to what I believe is the best approach to car-
rying  out  NASA’s  space  and  aeronautics  research  missions  with  the  resources  pro-
vided.  In  this  determination,  I  will  be  guided  by  the  NASA  Authorization  Acts,  an-
nual  Appropriations  Acts,  Presidential  policy,  and  the  decadal  survey  priorities  of 
the National Academy of Sciences. If we determine that there is an agency objective 
that  we  will  be  unable  to  meet,  I  will  inform  our  agency’s  stakeholders,  including 
this Subcommittee. 
Highlights of the NASA FY 2008 Budget Request 

The FY 2008 budget request for NASA is a carefully considered and balanced re-
quest formulated over many months with the White House. Unfortunately, the Con-
gress  had  not  completed  action  on  the  FY  2007  budget  at  the  time  the  FY  2008 
budget  was  being  finalized,  so  the  impact  of  the  final  FY  2007  appropriation  out-
come  is  not  accounted  for  in  NASA’s  FY  2008  budget  request.  The  FY  2008  budget 
request  weaves  together  the  Nation’s  priorities  in  space  exploration,  scientific  dis-
covery,  and  aeronautics  research  that  will  help  fuel  this  Nation’s  future,  creating 
new  opportunities  for  scientific  benefit,  economic  growth,  national  security,  and 
international cooperation. 

The greatest challenge NASA faces is safely flying the Space Shuttle to assemble 
the  International  Space  Station  (ISS)  prior  to  retiring  the  Shuttle  in  2010,  while 
also  bringing  new  U.S.  human  spaceflight  capabilities  online  soon  thereafter.  We 
must  understand  that,  given  proper  goals,  human  spaceflight  is  a  strategic  capa-
bility for this Nation, and we must not allow it to slip away. In January, we remem-
bered those whom we have lost in the exploration of space. In the aftermath of the 
Columbia tragedy, President Bush addressed the NASA workforce, saying: ‘‘In your 
grief,  you  are  responding  as  your  friends  would  have  wished—with  focus,  profes-
sionalism, and unbroken faith in the mission of this agency.’’ We must commit our-
selves to the focus of professionalism and unbroken faith every day in order to carry 
out the tasks before us. 

In  analyzing  not  only  the  root  causes,  but  also  the  systemic  reasons  behind  the 
Columbia accident, the Columbia Accident Investigation Board (CAIB) made critical 
observations that guided the formulation of our present civil space policy. I fear that 
with  the  passage  of  time  and  the  press  of  other  concerns,  we  may  be  losing  sight 
of  some  of  these  principles,  so  let  me  reiterate  some  of  them  here  today.  First,  the 
CAIB  noted  that,  ‘‘The  U.S.  civilian  space  effort  has  moved  forward  for  more  than 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:31 Jun 08, 2007 Jkt 034851 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34851.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

10

30  years  without  a  guiding  vision.’’  Second,  ‘‘because  the  Shuttle  is  now  an  aging 
system  but  still  developmental  in  character,  it  is  in  the  Nation’s  interest  to  replace 
the  Shuttle  as  soon  as  possible  as  the  primary  means  for  transporting  humans  to 
and from Earth orbit.’’ Third, ‘‘the previous attempts to develop a replacement vehi-
cle for the aging Shuttle represent a failure of national leadership.’’ And finally, the 
Board  noted  that  ‘‘this  approach  can  only  be  successful:  if  it  is  sustained  over  the 
decade; if by the time a decision to develop a new vehicle is made there is a clearer 
idea  of  how  the  new  transportation  system  fits  into  the  Nation’s  overall  plans  for 
space;  and  if  the  U.S.  Government  is  willing  at  the  time  a  development  decision  is 
made to commit the substantial resources required to implement it.’’

Since  then,  the  President,  the  Congress  and  NASA  have  charted  a  new  course  in 
U.S.  civil  space  policy  that  addresses  all  of  these  points,  and  the  President’s  FY 
2008  budget  reaffirms  that  commitment  with  the  necessary  funds  for  the  Space 
Shuttle and the ISS. NASA will continue forward at the best possible pace with the 
development of the Orion and Ares I crew vehicles. However, due to the cumulative 
effect  of  Space  Shuttle  Return  to  Flight  and  operations  cost  increases  and  the  FY 
2007  appropriation,  NASA  may  not  be  able  to  bring  these  new  capabilities  on-line 
by  2014.  If  we  do  not  quickly  come  to  grips  with  this  issue,  America  may  have  a 
prolonged  gap  between  the  end  of  the  Shuttle  program  and  the  beginning  of  Orion 
and Ares I operational capability, a gap similar to the one that occurred from 1975 
to 1981 when our Nation transitioned from Apollo to the Space Shuttle. 

NASA  has  a  lot  of  hard  work  ahead  of  it  and  many  major  milestones  this  year 
and next. The transition from the Space Shuttle to the Orion and Ares launch vehi-
cles  over  the  next  several  years  must  be  carefully  managed,  and  we  must  be  fo-
cused,  professional  and  committed  to  our  mission.  This  is  NASA’s  greatest  chal-
lenge, and I ask the Subcommittee’s help in meeting it. 

In  the  important  area  of  Earth  Science,  we  recently  received  the  first-ever 
Decadal  Survey  for  Earth  Science  from  the  National  Academy  of  Sciences,  which 
NASA,  the  National  Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Administration  (NOAA),  and  the 
United States Geological Survey (USGS) requested in 2003. As the first of its kind, 
the Survey has drawn considerable attention, and we will observe the programmatic 
priorities  for  Earth  Science  which  it  advocates.  In  addressing  the  Survey’s  Earth 
Science  priorities,  and  consistent  with  ensuring  that  NASA  maintains  a  balanced 
portfolio of science as directed by the NASA Authorization Act of 2005 (Pub. L. 109–
155),  we  have  added  funding  to  the  Global  Precipitation  Measurement  (GPM)  mis-
sion,  the  follow-on  to  the  highly  successful  Tropical  Rainfall  Measuring  Mission 
(TRMM),  to  improve  our  ability  to  keep  this  mission  on  schedule.  Our  plan  is  to 
launch  the  first  Core  satellite  for  the  GPM  mission  not  later  than  2013,  followed 
by  the  second  Constellation  spacecraft  the  following  year.  The  FY  2008  budget  re-
quest also augments funding for the Landsat Data Continuity Mission (LDCM) and 
Glory  missions  in  order  to  help  keep  those  projects  on  schedule.  Within  Planetary 
Sciences,  funding  has  been  identified  for  Lunar  Science  research  project  beginning 
in FY 2008 to leverage the many opportunities for payloads on NASA and other na-
tions’  lunar  spacecraft,  such  as  India’s  Chandrayaan–1,  as  well  as  to  analyze  the 
science  data  from  these  missions,  including  NASA’s  Lunar  Reconnaissance  Orbiter. 
In  2008,  we  will  launch  a  host  of  Heliophysics  missions,  many  with  international 
and  interagency  partners,  to  analyze  the  effects  of  solar  flares,  coronal  mass  ejec-
tions,  and  galactic  cosmic  rays.  In  Astrophysics,  the  final  Hubble  servicing  mission 
is currently planned for a Space Shuttle flight in September 2008. And, as I advised 
the  Congress  and  the  science  community  last  summer,  NASA  has  reinstated  the 
Stratospheric  Observatory  for  Infrared  Astronomy  (SOFIA)  mission.  Though  we 
know of no technical show-stoppers in regard to the airworthiness of the aircraft or 
operation  of  the  telescope,  this  program  has  some  remaining  hurdles  to  overcome 
and so remains subject to a management review later this spring. NASA will launch 
or  participate  in  seven  science  missions  in  FY  2007,  followed  by  10  missions  in  FY 
2008, resulting in many new Earth and space science discoveries in the years ahead. 
The FY 2008 budget request increases the budget profile for Aeronautics Research 
over  the  President’s  FY  2007  request,  aligns  our  aeronautics  activities  with  the 
President’s  recently  issued  Aeronautics  Research  and  Development  Policy,  and  ad-
vances  U.S.  technical  leadership  in  aeronautics.  NASA  has  made  significant 
progress in reformulating its approach to aeronautics research by collaborating with 
the broad research community including industry, academia, and other government 
agencies  including  the  Federal  Aviation  Administration  (FAA)  and  the  Department 
of Defense (DOD). Through these changes, NASA will help ensure that America con-
tinues to lead the way in aeronautics research. 

NASA continues to monitor and manage our ‘‘uncovered capacity’’ (employees not 
directly  assigned  to  specific  projects  and  programs).  A  little  over  18  months  ago, 
nearly  3,000  of  NASA’s  19,000  employees  were  designated  as  ‘‘uncovered  capacity.’’ 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:31 Jun 08, 2007 Jkt 034851 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34851.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

11

Today, largely with the work defined in the Constellation program, we have greatly 
reduced  that  problem  to  manageable  levels.  As  of  February  2007,  we  have  fewer 
than 200 uncovered capacity employees in FY 2007 and FY 2008. More importantly, 
many of our best engineers are working diligently on the great challenges before us. 
Every  NASA  Center  is  now  vested  in  our  space  exploration  mission.  While  we  are 
proud  of  the  progress  that  has  been  made,  significant  human  capital  challenges  re-
main.  These  include  matching  available  skills  with  the  important  work  to  be  done, 
managing attrition, retraining and hiring, and improving our workforce planning for 
future years in FY 2009 and beyond. To address these challenges and any potential 
impacts resulting from the FY 2007 funding reductions, we have established a new 
intra-agency Workforce Planning Technical Team. 

In addition, beginning in FY 2007, the agency revised overhead allocations to sim-
plify  how  we  manage  under  full  cost  accounting.  These  changes  will  ensure  a  uni-
form cost rate for all NASA civil servants across the agency’s government field cen-
ters. All changes are revenue-neutral to programs and projects; none of NASA’s mis-
sions gain or lose funding as a result of this accounting change. At first glance, this 
accounting  change  appears  to  reduce  the  Aeronautics  Research  budget  because  so 
much  of  that  work  is  done  at  our  smaller  research  Centers.  However,  in  actuality, 
NASA’s  direct  spending  for  Aeronautics  Research  has  increased  in  the  FY  2008 
budget  runout  by  $205  million  through  FY  2011  compared  to  the  FY  2007  budget 
runout. 

Beyond our budget request, NASA is beginning to transition the workforce, infra-
structure, and equipment from the Space Shuttle to new Exploration systems. Many 
of  our  most  experienced  people  will  be  considering  retirement  between  now  and 
2010.  We  will  need  the  means  to  manage  this  attrition  in  a  targeted  manner  to 
achieve  better  alignment  of  the  workforce  with  our  mission  without  creating  un-
wanted  losses  and  skills  imbalances.  One  tool  we  may  be  using  is  the  authority  for 
the agency to be able to re-employ selected retirees without an offset to their annu-
ity—thus giving them an incentive to see a project or program to completion. To as-
sist employees with transition to the private sector, and ease that upheaval, another 
tool would authorize NASA to continue their coverage under the Federal Employees 
Health Insurance for 1 year after departure. 

We will also need better tools to manage the transition of our facilities. The agen-
cy is proposing slight changes and expansion to existing authority to permit leasing 
of under-utilized facilities and related equipment. The agency would retain the pro-
ceeds  of  those  leases  to  be  deposited  in  a  NASA  capital  asset  account  and  invested 
in activities to improve and sustain our facilities and infrastructure. We plan to dis-
cuss the details of these legislative requests with Members of Congress in the weeks 
and months ahead. 

The  remainder  of  my  testimony  outlines  the  FY  2008  budget  request  for  NASA 

in greater detail. 
Science Mission Directorate 

This  past  year  was  truly  remarkable  for  science  discovery  about  the  Earth,  Sun, 
solar  system,  and  universe.  NASA  was  responsible  for  11  percent  of  Science  News 
magazine’s  top  stories  (covering  all  fields  of  science)  for  2006,  which  is  an  all-time 
record in the 34 years of tracking this metric. NASA’s findings ranged from new ob-
servations  of  familiar  phenomena  like  hurricanes,  thunderstorms,  and  rainfall,  to 
the identification of 16 new extra-solar planets orbiting distant stars near the center 
of  our  galaxy.  As  NASA  continues  to  add  observations  from  long-lived  assets  such 
as the Spirit and Opportunity Mars Exploration Rovers, it continues to successfully 
develop  and  launch  the  next  generation  of  missions  and  to  support  a  vigorous  sci-
entific community. 

In 2006, NASA launched four new science missions, one technology demonstration 
mission,  and  partnered  with  other  Federal  and  international  agencies  to  launch 
three  other  science  and  technology  missions,  as  well  as  the  GOES–O  satellite,  to 
bring  the  current  total  number  of  operational  science  missions  to  52.  In  January 
2006,  we  launched  the  New  Horizons  spacecraft  to  the  planet  Pluto.  Scheduled  to 
arrive  at  Pluto  in  2015,  the  spacecraft  is  making  its  closest  approach  to  Jupiter  as 
we speak. With the April 2006 launch of the CloudSat and Cloud-Aerosol Lidar and 
Infrared  Pathfinder  Satellite  Observations  (CALIPSO)  spacecraft,  NASA  added  to 
the ‘‘A-train’’ of satellites flying in close proximity around Earth to gain a better un-
derstanding of key factors related to climate change. In October 2006, NASA’s twin 
Solar  Terrestrial  Relations  Observatories  mission  (STEREO)  spacecraft  were 
launched to help researchers construct the first-ever 3-dimensional views of the sun. 
Although  the  two  spacecraft  will  not  return  images  until  later  this  year,  initial  re-
sults  from  STEREO  have  provided  us  with  an  unprecedented  look  at  solar  activity. 
A  few  weeks  ago,  we  also  recently  launched  five  Time  History  of  Events  and 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:31 Jun 08, 2007 Jkt 034851 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34851.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

12

Macroscale  Interactions  during  Substorms  (THEMIS)  microsatellites  to  study  the 
Earth’s  magnetosphere,  and  we  are  on  track  to  launch  the  Dawn  mission  to  main 
belt of asteroids between Mars and Jupiter and the Phoenix Mars mission later this 
year. 

NASA’s  FY  2008  budget  requests  $5.5  billion  for  the  agency’s  Science  portfolio. 
This represents an increase of $49.3 million (or 1 percent) over the FY 2007 request 
and will enable NASA to launch or partner on 10 new missions, operate and provide 
ground  support  for  more  than  50  spacecraft,  and  fund  scientific  research  based  on 
the  data  returned  from  these  missions.  For  FY  2008,  NASA  separated  the  Earth-
Sun  System  theme  into  two  themes:  Earth  Science  and  Heliophysics,  and  pro-
grammatic responsibility for studies of Near Earth Objects is transferred to the Ex-
ploration Systems Mission Directorate 

The  Earth  Science  budget  requests  $1.5  billion,  an  increase  of  $27.7  million  over 
the FY 2007 request, to better understand the Earth’s atmosphere, lithosphere, hy-
drosphere, cryosphere, and biosphere as a single connected system. This request in-
cludes  additional  funding  for  the  Global  Precipitation  Measurement  (GPM)  mission 
to  improve  schedule  assurance  in  response  to  the  high  priority  placed  on  GPM  in 
the  Decadal  Survey.  As  the  follow-on  to  the  highly  successful  Tropical  Rainfall 
Measuring Mission, NASA’s plans to launch GPM’s first Core satellite no later than 
2013, followed by the second Constellation spacecraft the following year. The Earth 
Science  budget  also  includes  increased  funding  for  the  Landsat  Data  Continuity 
Mission and Glory in order to help keep them on their schedules, and provides funds 
for  the  National  Polar-orbiting  Operational  Environmental  Satellite  System 
(NPOESS)  Preparatory  Project  (NPP)  to  reflect  instrument  availability  and  launch 
delays.  Funds  are  requested  for  continued  development  and  implementation  of  the 
Ocean  Surface  Topography  Mission  to  launch  in  2008,  the  Aquarius  mission  to 
measure the ocean’s surface salinity to launch in 2009, and the Orbiting Carbon Ob-
servatory  mission  planned  for  launch  in  2008.  NASA  will  continue  to  contribute  to 
the  President’s  Climate  Change  Research  Initiative  by  collecting  data  sets  and  de-
veloping predictive capabilities that will enable advanced assessments of the causes 
and  consequences  of  global  climate  change.  Over  the  coming  months,  NASA  will 
evaluate  opportunities  for  implementing  the  recommendations  of  the  National  Re-
search  Council’s  Earth  Science  Decadal  Survey  and  responding  to  challenges  to  the 
continuity  of  climate  measurements  resulting  from  the  Nunn-McCurdy  recertifi-
cation of the NPOESS program. 

The  Heliophysics  budget  request  of  $1.1  billion  will  support  14  operational  mis-
sions  to  understand  the  Sun  and  its  effects  on  Earth,  the  solar  system,  and  the 
space environmental conditions that will be experienced by astronauts, and to dem-
onstrate technologies that can improve future operational systems. During FY 2008, 
the  Explorer  Program  will  launch  the  Interstellar  Boundary  Explorer  (IBEX)  mis-
sion, focused on the detection of the very edge of our solar system, and the Coupled 
Ion-Neural  Dynamics  Investigation  (CINDI)  Mission  of  Opportunity  conducted  by 
the University of Texas. The Solar Dynamics Observatory (SDO) to study the Sun’s 
magnetic  field  will  complete  launch  readiness  milestones  in  FY  2008  and  is  pres-
ently  scheduled  for  launch  in  August  of  2008.  The  Geospace  Radiation  Belt  Storm 
Probes (RBSP) mission, presently in formulation, will undergo a Preliminary Design 
Review and a Non-Advocate Review in FY 2008 in preparation for entering develop-
ment  in  early  FY  2009.  RBSP  will  improve  the  understanding  of  how  solar  storms 
interact with Earth’s Van Allen radiation belts. While the ST–7 and ST–8 missions 
are  on  track  for  launches  in  2009,  the  New  Millennium  ST–9  mission,  along  with 
follow-on missions, is delayed. 

(M3) 

The Planetary Science budget request of $1.4 billion will advance scientific knowl-
edge of the solar system, search for evidence of extraterrestrial life, and prepare for 
human  exploration.  NASA  will  get  an  early  start  on  Lunar  science  when  the  Dis-
covery  Program’s  Moon  Mineralogy  Mapper 
launches  aboard  India’s 
Chandrayaan-1  mission  in  March  2008,  along  with  the  Mini-RF,  a  technology  dem-
onstration payload, supported by NASA’s Exploration and Space Operations Mission 
Directorates  and  the  Department  of  Defense,  which  may  glean  water  in  the  Moon’s 
polar  regions.  In  addition,  the  budget  requests  $351  million  from  FY  2008  to  FY 
2012  for  new  Lunar  Science  research,  including  Missions  of  Opportunity,  data 
archiving, and research. The budget supports the Mars Exploration Program by pro-
viding  for  a  mission  every  26  months,  including  the  Phoenix  spacecraft,  scheduled 
for  launch  in  2007,  and  the  Mars  Science  Laboratory,  with  a  launch  scheduled  for 
2009. The Discovery Program’s Dawn Mission is scheduled to launch later this year, 
and  the  Mercury  Surface,  Space  Environment,  Geochemistry  and  Ranging  (MES-
SENGER) spacecraft is already on its way to Mercury. Three Discovery mission pro-
posals and three Missions of Opportunity were selected in 2006 for Phase A studies, 
and  the  Discovery  Program  will  invite  proposals  for  additional  new  missions  in 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:31 Jun 08, 2007 Jkt 034851 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34851.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

13

2008.  With  the  New  Horizons  spacecraft  continuing  on  its  way  to  Pluto,  the  New 
Frontiers  Program’s  Juno  Mission  will  undergo  a  Preliminary  Design  Review  and 
a  Non-Advocate  Review  in  FY  2008  in  preparation  for  entering  development.  The 
New Frontiers Program will release its third Announcement of Opportunity (AO) in 
late 2008. 

The Astrophysics budget requests $1.6 billion to operate NASA’s astronomical ob-
servatories,  including  the  Hubble  Space  Telescope  (HST),  Chandra  X-Ray  Observ-
atory, and Spitzer Space Telescope, and to build more powerful instruments to peer 
deeper into the cosmos. HST is scheduled for a final servicing mission in September 
2008 using the Space Shuttle Atlantis. Along with service life extension efforts, two 
new instruments will be installed during the servicing mission that are expected to 
dramatically  improve  performance  and  enable  further  discoveries,  including  ena-
bling some science observations that have been affected by the recent failure of the 
Advanced  Camera  for  Surveys.  After  the  servicing  mission,  HST  will  once  again 
have  six  fully  operational  instruments  (including  a  suite  of  cameras  and  spectro-
graphs  that  will  have  about  10  times  the  capability  of  older  instruments)  as  well 
as new hardware capable of supporting at least another 5 years of world-class space 
science. The ESA Herschel and Planck missions, both of which include contributions 
from  NASA,  will  launch  in  FY  2008  aboard  an  ESA-supplied  Ariane–5.  The  Kepler 
instrument and spacecraft integration and test will be completed in preparation for 
launch in November 2008, to determine the frequency of potentially habitable plan-
ets.  The  Gamma-ray  Large  Area  Space  Telescope  (GLAST)  will  launch  in  FY  2008 
to begin a five-year mission mapping the gamma-ray sky and investigating gamma-
ray  bursts.  The  James  Webb  Space  Telescope  will  undergo  Preliminary  Design  Re-
view  and  a  Non-Advocate  Review  in  FY  2008,  in  preparation  for  entering  develop-
ment. The SOFIA observatory has been reinstated. Though we know of no technical 
showstoppers  in  regard  to  the  airworthiness  of  the  aircraft  or  operation  of  the  tele-
scope, this program has some remaining hurdles to overcome and so remains subject 
to a management review later this spring chaired by the NASA Associate Adminis-
trator. The SOFIA program baseline will be finalized at that time. 
Exploration Systems Mission Directorate 

The  FY  2008  budget  request  for  the  Exploration  Systems  Mission  Directorate 
(ESMD)  is  $3.9  billion  to  support  continued  development  of  new  U.S.  human 
spaceflight capabilities and supporting technologies, and to enable sustained and af-
fordable  human  space  exploration  after  the  Space  Shuttle  is  retired  in  2010.  With 
this  budget,  ESMD  will  continue  to  try  to  operate  our  next-generation  Crew  Explo-
ration  Vehicle  by  2014,  while  also  providing  research  and  developing  technologies 
for  the  longer-term  development  of  a  sustained  human  presence  on  the  Moon. 
ESMD  will  also  continue  to  work  with  other  nations  and  the  commercial  sector  to 
leverage  its  investments  and  identify  opportunities  for  specific  collaboration  on 
lunar data and lunar surface activities. New human spaceflight development of this 
magnitude,  such  as  the  Orion  Crew  Exploration  Vehicle,  occurs  once  in  a  genera-
tion. The next 5 years are a critical period in our Nation’s space flight efforts. 

The  Constellation  program  includes  the  Orion  Crew  Exploration  Vehicle;  Ares  I, 
a  highly  reliable  crew  launch  vehicle;  Commercial  Orbital  Transportation  Services 
(COTS) demonstrations of cargo and crew transport to the International Space Sta-
tion; Ares V, a heavy-lift launch vehicle; spacesuits and tools required by the flight 
crews  and;  associated  ground  and  mission  operations  infrastructure  to  support  ei-
ther lunar and/or initial low Earth orbit (LEO) missions. 

For  FY  2008,  pending  a  full  analysis  of  the  FY  2007  budget  impacts,  ESMD  is 
on track to maintain its commitments for Ares I and Orion, and to continue meeting 
major milestones. This year Constellation will continue to mature and develop over-
all. Formulation of the Constellation elements will continue, leading to the Prelimi-
nary  Design  Review  in  2008,  at  which  time  the  program  will  be  baselined.  NASA 
will  conduct  an  update  for  the  overall  Constellation  Systems  Requirements  Review 
(SRR)  in  2007  after  the  completion  of  all  the  Program  Element  SRRs.  ESMD  re-
cently  released  the  Ares  I  Upper  Stage  Request  for  Proposals  (RFP).  The  RFP  for 
the  Ares  I  Avionics  Ring  is  scheduled  for  release  in  May  2007,  with  selection  and 
contract award scheduled for November 2007. 

Facility, equipment, and personnel transitions from Space Shuttle to Constellation 
will  be  the  major  emphasis  of  the  FY  2009  budget  process.  NASA  transition  activi-
ties  are  focused  on  managing  the  evolution  from  current  operations  of  the  Space 
Shuttle  to  future  operations  of  Constellation  and  emerging  commercial  services,  in 
a  safe,  successful  and  smooth  process.  This  joint  effort  between  the  Space  Oper-
ations  Mission  Directorate  (SOMD)  and  ESMD  includes  the  utilization  and  disposi-
tion of resources, including real and personal property, personnel, and processes, to 
leverage  existing  Shuttle  and  International  Space  Station  assets  for  NASA’s  future 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:31 Jun 08, 2007 Jkt 034851 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34851.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

14

Exploration  activities.  Formalized  Transition  Boards  are  working  to  achieve  this 
outcome. A Human Spaceflight Transition Plan was developed in 2006, updates are 
in  work,  and  metrics  for  the  plan  are  being  refined  and  will  be  implemented  in 
2007. 

In  August  2006,  NASA  signed  Space  Act  Agreements  with  Space  Exploration 
Technologies  Corporation,  of  El  Segundo,  California,  and  Rocketplane-Kistler,  of 
Oklahoma  City,  Oklahoma,  to  develop  and  demonstrate  Commercial  Orbital  Trans-
portation Services (COTS) that could open new markets and pave the way for com-
mercial  providers  to  launch  and  deliver  crew  and  cargo  to  the  ISS.  The  Space  Act 
Agreements  establish  milestones  and  identify  objective  criteria  to  assess  their 
progress throughout Phase 1 of the demonstrations. In the FY 2008 budget, funding 
for the purchase of crew and cargo transportation services, either from international 
partners  or  preferably  from  commercial  providers,  is  transferred  from  ESMD  to 
SOMD.  COTS  demonstration  funding  remains  in  ESMD  to  better  exploit  potential 
synergies with the Constellation Program. 

With activities in the Advanced Capabilities program, NASA seeks to understand 
the space environment as it relates to human performance by addressing respective 
recommendations  from  the  Exploration  Systems  Architecture  Study  that  was  con-
ducted  in  2005.  This  included  refocusing  biomedical  research  and  human  life-sup-
port  activities  through  new  milestones  and  requirements  to  target  the  timely  deliv-
ery  of  research  products.  Accordingly,  ESMD  created  two  new  programs  under  Ad-
vanced  Capabilities:  the  Human  Research  Program  (HRP)  to  study  and  mitigate 
risks to astronaut health and performance and the Exploration Technology Develop-
ment  Program  (ETDP)  to  enable  future  Exploration  missions  and  reduce  cost  and 
risk. Plans for 2008 include:

and landing attenuation systems;

• Testing of prototype ablative heat shield materials, low-impact docking systems, 
• Testing of advanced environmental control systems on the ISS;
• Developing a lightweight composite command module test article for the Orion;
• Conducting  studies  to  assess  risks  of  long-term  radiation  exposure  and  con-
tinuing  the  use  of  the  ISS  as  a  testbed  for  studying  human  health  and  safety 
in space;
• Spacecraft integration and testing in preparation for the Lunar Reconnaissance 
• Next-generation spacesuit capable of supporting exploration; and
• Developing  jointly  with  the  USAF  the  RS–68  engine  that  will  be  used  on  the 

Orbiter (LRO) launch in October 2008;

Ares V.

Finally, the LRO and the Lunar CRater Observatory Sensing Satellite (LCROSS) 
to  the  Moon  is  planned  to  be  launched  in  early  FY  2008.  These  dual-manifested 
spacecraft have completed Critical Design Review and are currently in development. 
The science yielded from these missions will enable future outpost site selection and 
new  information  about  the  deep  craters  at  the  lunar  poles.  The  LRO/LCROSS  mis-
sions represent NASA’s first steps in returning to the Moon. 
Aeronautics Research Mission Directorate 

In  2006,  NASA’s  Aeronautics  Research  Mission  Directorate  (ARMD)  conducted  a 
significant restructuring of its aeronautics program, allowing NASA to pursue high-
quality,  innovative,  and  integrated  research  that  will  yield  revolutionary  tools,  con-
cepts,  and  technologies  to  enable  a  safer,  more  flexible,  environmentally  friendly, 
and efficient national air transportation system. As such, ARMD’s research will con-
tinue  to  play  a  vital  role  in  supporting  NASA’s  human  and  robotic  space  activities. 
The reshaped Aeronautics Program content and direction is consistent with the Na-
tional  Aeronautics  Research  and  Development  Policy,  signed  by  the  President  on 
December 20, 2006. 

A primary goal across all of the programs in ARMD is to establish strong partner-
ships involving NASA, other government agencies, academia, and industry in order 
to  enable  significant  advancement  in  our  Nation’s  aeronautical  expertise.  Because 
these  partnerships  are  so  important,  NASA  has  put  many  mechanisms  in  place  to 
engage  academia  and  industry,  including  industry  working  groups  and  technical 
interchange  meetings  at  the  program  and  project  level,  Space  Act  agreements  for 
cooperative  partnerships,  and  the  NASA  Research  Announcement  (NRA)  process 
that provides for full and open competition for the best and most promising research 
ideas.  During  2006,  ARMD’s  NRA  solicitation  resulted  in  the  selection  of  135  pro-
posals for negotiation for award from 72 different organizations representing 29 dif-
ferent states plus the District of Columbia. NASA’s FY 2008 budget request for Aer-
onautics includes $51 million for NRA awards. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:31 Jun 08, 2007 Jkt 034851 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34851.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

15

In  FY  2008,  the  President’s  budget  for  NASA  requests  $554  million  for  Aero-
nautics Research. This budget reflects full cost simplification, which significantly re-
duces the Center overhead and infrastructure allocated to Aeronautics programs. 

NASA’s  Airspace  Systems  Program  (ASP)  has  partnered  with  the  Joint  Planning 
and  Development  Office  (JPDO)  to  help  develop  concepts,  capabilities  and  tech-
nologies  that  will  lead  to  significant  enhancements  in  the  capacity,  efficiency  and 
flexibility  of  the  National  Airspace  System  (NAS).  Such  improvements  are  critical 
to meet the Nation’s airspace and airports requirements for decades to come. In FY 
2008, NASA’s budget request would provide $98.1 million for ASP to conduct further 
research  in  operational  concepts  and  human-in-the-loop  simulation  modeling  that 
supports advancements in automated separation assurance capabilities. In addition, 
ASP will pursue enhanced development of airport surface movement trajectory mod-
els to provide a basis for optimized use of super density airports, integrated airport 
clusters, and terminals where demand for runways is high. Last year, ASP took an 
important  step  toward  this  goal  by  completing  development  of  a  system-wide  oper-
ational concept that provides a detailed description of future NAS capacity enhance-
ments  while  assessing  the  benefits  of  such  system  improvements.  Key  to  the  anal-
ysis  of  the  operational  concepts  was  program-developed  tools  such  as  the  Airspace 
Concepts  Evaluation  System  and  the  Future  Air  Traffic  Management  Concepts 
Evaluation  Tool,  both  of  which  have  successfully  transitioned  from  NASA  to  the 
Federal Aviation Administration and the JPDO. 

NASA’s  Fundamental  Aeronautics  Program  (FAP)  conducts  research  in  the  engi-
neering and scientific disciplines that enable the design of vehicles that fly through 
any  atmosphere  at  any  speed.  The  FY  2008  budget  request,  amounting  to  $293.4 
million,  will  enable  significant  advances  in  the  Hypersonics,  Supersonics,  Subsonic 
Fixed  Wing,  and  Subsonic  Rotary  Wing  projects  that  make  up  the  FAP.  These 
projects focus on creating innovative solutions for the technical challenges of the fu-
ture:  increasing  performance  (range,  speed,  payload,  fuel  efficiency)  while  meeting 
stringent noise and emissions constraints; alleviating environmental and congestion 
problems  of  the  Next  Generation  Air  Transportation  System  (NGATS)  through  the 
use  of  new  aircraft  and  rotorcraft  concepts;  and  facilitating  access  to  space  and  re-
entry into planetary atmospheres. A wide variety of cross-cutting research topics are 
being  pursued  across  the  speed  regimes  with  emphasis  on  physics-based  multi-dis-
ciplinary  analysis  and  design,  aerothermodynamics,  materials  and  structures,  pro-
pulsion, aero-servo-elasticity, thermal protection systems, advanced control methods, 
and  computational  and  experimental  techniques.  A  number  of  key  activities  are 
planned for FY 2007 and 2008 including the launch of a suborbital rocket to conduct 
flight experiments in hypersonic boundary layer transition and re-entry shapes, the 
flight  test  of  scale  models  of  the  X–48B  Blended  Wing-Body  concept  to  assess  this 
advanced unconventional airframe configuration for its potential to decrease aircraft 
noise  while  also  improving  performance,  the  evaluation  of  radical  new  concepts  for 
variable-speed  rotor  technologies  that  can  result  in  highly  improved  performance, 
and the evaluation of actively-controlled inlets for supersonic transports. 

The FY 2008 budget request for NASA’s Aviation Safety Program (AvSP) is $74.1 
million.  The  four  projects  within  the  Program  (Integrated  Intelligent  Flight  Deck, 
Integrated Resilient Aircraft Control, Aircraft Aging and Durability, and Integrated 
Vehicle  Health  Management)  will  develop  cutting-edge  tools,  methods,  and  tech-
nologies  with  close  coordination  among  them  to  improve  the  intrinsic  safety  at-
tributes of current and future aircraft that will operate in the NGATS. In FY 2008, 
the  Program  will  complete  a  study  of  human-automation  technology  that  will  im-
prove safety during approach and landing operations by allowing for active operator 
assistance  that  maintains  appropriate  levels  of  workload  and  will  be  conducted  to 
evaluate  neural  networks  for  direct  adaptive  control  that  will  maximize  adaptation 
to  simulated  in-flight  failures  while  minimizing  adverse  interactions.  At  the  same 
time,  onboard  sensor  technology  will  be  developed  and  validated  to  achieve  signifi-
cant  improvement  in  measuring  atmospheric  water  content  that  will  improve  the 
ability  to  detect  the  onset  of  potential  icing  hazards.  Challenges  related  to  aircraft 
aging  and  durability  will  also  be  addressed  by  developing  models  capable  of  simu-
lating the initiation and propagation of minute cracks in metallic materials. 

Finally,  NASA’s  Aeronautics  Test  Program  (ATP)  will  continue  to  safeguard  the 
strategic availability of a critical suite of aeronautics test facilities that are deemed 
necessary  to  meet  agency  and  national  aeronautics  needs.  The  FY  2008  budget  re-
quest  for  ATP  is  $88.4  million,  which  will  enable  strategic  utilization,  operations, 
maintenance  and  investment  decisions  for  major  wind  tunnel/ground  test  facilities 
at Ames Research Center, Glenn Research Center and Langley Research Center and 
for  the  Western  Aeronautical  Test  Range  support  aircraft  and  test  bed  aircraft  at 
Dryden  Flight  Research  Center.  In  FY  2006,  NASA  implemented  procedures  to  en-
sure  affordable  and  competitive  pricing  of  its  aeronautics  facilities  for  use  by  other 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:31 Jun 08, 2007 Jkt 034851 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34851.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

16

parties,  including  industry  and  university  researchers.  In  FY  2008,  ATP  plans  to 
continue  ensuring  competitive  prices  for  ATP  facilities,  reducing  a  backlog  of  main-
tenance  issues  and  investing  in  advanced  technologies  such  as  installing  consistent 
angle of attack instrumentation at the research Centers. 
Space Operations Mission Directorate 

This  was  an  extraordinary  year  for  the  Space  Shuttle  and  International  Space 
Station  (ISS)  Programs.  NASA  celebrated  Independence  Day  2006  by  launching 
Space Shuttle Discovery on the STS–121 mission. The second of two test flights (the 
first was STS–114 in July/August 2005), STS–121 helped validate the improvements 
made  to  the  Space  Shuttle  system  since  the  loss  of  Columbia  on  February  1,  2003. 
The  mission  also  marked  the  return  of  a  complement  of  three  crewmembers  to  the 
ISS. The Space Shuttle Atlantis (STS–115), which launched on September 9, marked 
a  return  to  sustained  Space  Shuttle  operations  and  placed  NASA  on  track  to  com-
pleting  assembly  of  the  ISS  by  2010.  STS–115  delivered  the  critical  P3/P4  truss  to 
the  ISS,  which  will  provide  a  quarter  of  the  power  services  needed  to  operate  the 
completed research facility. The last flight in December 2006, STS–116, was devoted 
primarily  to  deactivating  the  electrical  power  systems  on  the  U.S.  segment  of  the 
ISS  and  making  a  series  of  electrical  and  coolant  connections  between  the  P3/P4 
truss  segment  and  the  rest  of  the  Station.  To  do  this,  flight  controllers  at  the  mis-
sion control centers in Houston and Moscow uplinked over 17,900 commands to the 
ISS  during  the  mission—all  without  a  single  unplanned  or  command  error.  STS–
116  crewmember  Robert  Curbeam  also  set  a  record  for  the  most  spacewalks  ever 
conducted  by  an  astronaut  on  a  single  Space  Shuttle  mission,  with  four  excursions 
totaling over 25 hours. 

Operational  activities  onboard  the  ISS  have  continued  into  2007,  with  a  series  of 
spacewalks  that  reconfigured  the  thermal  system  on  the  Station  and  prepared  us 
for  future  assembly  tasks.  The  Station  is  now  able  to  provide  additional  power  to 
the  Space  Shuttle,  allowing  two  extra  docked  days,  and  we  have  connected  perma-
nent systems in place of temporary ones. The sequence of three complex spacewalks 
within  9  days  also  demonstrated  capabilities  we  will  need  later  this  year  to  fully 
install Node 2 following its delivery on STS–120. 

These mission achievements reflect the NASA team’s dedication to safely and suc-
cessfully  flying  out  the  Space  Shuttle  program  and  meeting  our  Nation’s  commit-
ments to our international partners. The program’s successes also led to the decision 
in  October  2006  to  move  forward  with  plans  for  a  final  servicing  mission  to  the 
Hubble Space Telescope (HST). Following an extensive review by the relevant NASA 
offices  of  all  safety  and  technical  issues  associated  with  conducting  such  a  mission, 
it  became  clear  that  an  HST  servicing  mission  could  be  carried  out  effectively  and 
safely. While there is an inherent risk in all spaceflight activities, the desire to pre-
serve  a  truly  international  asset  like  the  HST  makes  doing  this  mission  the  right 
course of action. 

The  Space  Shuttle  FY  2008  budget  request  of  $4,007  million  would  provide  for 
five Shuttle flights, including four ISS assembly flights as well as the HST servicing 
mission. The ISS assembly flights include the launch of major research facility mod-
ules  from  the  European  Space  Agency  and  Japan.  The  Canadian  Special  Purpose 
Dexterous  Manipulator  robotic  system  will  also  be  flown  in  2008.  These  flights  are 
a  major  step  toward  fulfilling  U.S.  commitments  to  NASA’s  international  partners 
as specified in the ISS agreements and the Vision for Space Exploration. 

The FY 2008 budget request includes $2,239 million for ISS activities. NASA has 
consulted  with  our  international  partners  on  the  configuration  of  the  ISS,  and  is 
working closely with them to determine the detailed plans for logistics required dur-
ing  and  after  assembly.  The  FY  2008  budget  request  provides  the  necessary  re-
sources to purchase Soyuz crew transport and rescue for U.S. astronauts as well as 
Progress vehicle logistics support for the ISS from the Russian Space Agency. 

As  the  Shuttle  approaches  its  retirement,  the  ISS  Program  intends  to  use  alter-
native cargo and crew transportation services from commercial industry. Once a ca-
pability is demonstrated in Phase 1 of the Commercial Orbital Transportation Serv-
ices (COTS) Space Act Agreements, NASA plans to purchase cargo delivery services 
competitively  in  Phase  2  and  will  decide  whether  to  pursue  crew  demonstrations. 
In  the  FY  2008  budget,  funding  for  the  purchase  of  crew  and  cargo  transportation 
services, either from international partners or preferably from commercial providers, 
is transferred from the Exploration Systems Mission Directorate to the Space Oper-
ations  Mission  Directorate.  One  item  of  significance  in  the  FY  2008  budget  runout, 
especially in the out-years, is that it allows for increases to our previously estimated 
costs for purchasing commercial cargo and crew services to support the ISS, assum-
ing  these  commercial  services  are  successfully  demonstrated  and  are  cost-effective. 
Should  costs  for  those  services  be  greater  than  what  is  presently  budgeted,  NASA 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:31 Jun 08, 2007 Jkt 034851 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34851.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

17

has  accepted  a  management  challenge  to  scale  back  on  our  space  operations  costs 
and will curtail some of our robotic lunar exploration or long-term exploration tech-
nology  development  in  the  out-years.  COTS  demonstration  funding  remains  in 
ESMD to better exploit potential synergies with the Constellation Program. 

The  Space  Shuttle  Program’s  highest  priority  is  to  safely  complete  the  mission 
manifest  by  the  end  of  FY  2010,  using  as  few  flights  as  possible.  Working  through 
formalized Transition Control Board processes, the Space Shuttle Program will also 
play  a  key  role  in  coordinating  the  smooth  transition  of  Space  Shuttle  assets  and 
capabilities to the next generation of Exploration systems without compromising the 
safety of ongoing flight operations. The greatest challenge NASA faces is safely fly-
ing  the  Space  Shuttle  to  assemble  the  ISS  prior  to  retiring  the  Shuttle  in  2010, 
while  also  bringing  new  U.S.  human  spaceflight  capabilities  online  soon  thereafter. 
There  are  a  number  of  major  transition  milestones  set  for  FY  2008,  including  the 
transition of one of the four high bays in the Vehicle Assembly Building and Launch 
Pad 39B to the Constellation Systems Program. Space Shuttle Atlantis may also be 
retired  in  FY  2008  after  the  HST  SM–4  mission  and  its  systems  and  parts  would 
be used to support the remaining Space Shuttle Orbiters, Discovery and Endeavour, 
during the program’s last 2 years of operations. The FY 2008 budget request reflects 
the  current  assessment  of  costs  to  retire  the  Space  Shuttle.  Over  the  next  year, 
NASA will develop additional detail and refine our cost estimates for the transition. 
The FY 2008 budget also provides for the procurement of two additional Tracking 
and  Data  Relay  Satellite  System  (TDRSS)  satellites  to  replenish  the  constellation. 
NASA  projects  that  the  availability  of  aging  TDRSS  satellites  to  support  overall 
user  demand  will  be  reduced  by  2009  and  depleted  by  2015.  In  order  to  continue 
to  support  all  users,  NASA  must  begin  the  procurement  process  immediately,  with 
planned  launches  in  FY  2012  and  FY  2013.  By  replenishing  the  satellites,  NASA 
will be able to meet overall user demand through 2016. The Space Operations Mis-
sion  Directorate  has  partnered  with  non-NASA  users  to  provide  a  proportionate  in-
vestment in the replacement capabilities. 
Cross-Agency Support Programs 

The FY 2008 Budget Request for activities within the Cross-Agency Support Pro-
grams  (CASP)—Education,  Advanced  Business  Systems,  Innovative  Partnerships 
Programs,  and  Shared  Capabilities  Assets  Program—is  $498.2  million.  Within  this 
amount,  $34.3  million  is  for  the  Shared  Capability  Assets  Program  (SCAP),  which 
is  designed  to  ensure  that  critical  capabilities  and  assets  (e.g.,  arc  jets,  wind  tun-
nels, super computing facilities, rocket propulsion testing, etc.) required agency-wide 
are  available  to  missions  when  needed.  The  FY  2008  budget  request  for  Advanced 
Business  Systems,  comprising  the  Integrated  Enterprise  Management  Program 
(IEMP),  is  $103.1  million.  FY  2007  and  FY  2008  funding  will  support  IEMP  in  im-
plementing capabilities that improve NASA’s tracking and accountability of its prop-
erty, plant, and equipment; integrate human capital information, providing employ-
ees and management with new, secure tools for accessing personnel data, and plan-
ning  and  budgeting  NASA’s  workforce;  and,  provide  more  relevant  and  accurate  fi-
nancial  information  in  support  to  NASA’s  programs  and  projects.  This  funding  also 
supports ongoing operations and maintenance of NASA’s financial system and other 
agency-wide business systems. 

For NASA’s Education activities, the FY 2008 budget request totals $153.7 million 
and sustains our ongoing commitment to excellence in science, technology, engineer-
ing, and mathematics (STEM) to ensure that our agency is equipped with the right 
workforce  to  implement  the  Vision  for  Space  Exploration.  NASA  will  continue  the 
tradition of investing in education and supporting educators who play a key role in 
preparing,  inspiring,  exciting,  encouraging,  and  nurturing  the  youth  who  will  man-
age  and  lead  the  laboratories  and  research  centers  of  tomorrow.  NASA  Education 
is  committed  to  three  primary  objectives  to  help  improve  the  state  of  STEM  edu-
cation in our country: strengthen the Nation’s and NASA’s future workforce; attract 
and  retain  students  in  the  STEM  discipline  and;  engage  the  American  people  in 
NASA’s missions through partnerships and alliances. 

The  Innovative  Partnerships  Programs  (IPP)  provides  leveraged  technology  in-
vestments,  dual-use  technology-related  partnerships,  and  technology  solutions  for 
NASA. The FY 2008 budget request for IPP activities is $198.1 million. The IPP im-
plements  NASA’s  Small  Business  Innovative  Research  (SBIR)  and  Small  Business 
Technology  Transfer  (STTR)  Programs  that  provide  the  high-technology  small  busi-
ness  sector  with  an  opportunity  to  develop  technology  for  NASA.  Recently,  NASA 
has made some changes to the management structure of these two programs to bet-
ter  enable  technology  infusion  and  to  increase  the  efficiency  of  the  operations.  IPP 
also  manages  the  Centennial  Challenges  Program.  NASA  has  already  benefited 
from the introduction of new sources of innovation and technology development even 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:31 Jun 08, 2007 Jkt 034851 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34851.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

18

though the Program is relatively new and no prizes have yet been awarded. In addi-
tion,  ongoing  and  future  prize  challenges  will  continue  to  inspire  brilliant  young 
minds. 
Conclusion 

NASA has many challenges ahead of us, but we are on track and making progress 
in  managing  these  challenges.  The  FY  2008  budget  request  demonstrates  commit-
ment  to  our  Nation’s  leadership  in  space  and  aeronautics  research,  and  while  we 
may  face  a  significant  funding  reduction  for  FY  2007,  we  will  carry  on,  though  not 
at the pace we had previously hoped. 

I  ask  your  help  to  ensure  this  Nation  maintains  a  human  space  flight  capability. 
Without stable funding as requested in this budget, we face the very real possibility 
of allowing that capability to slip away for the foreseeable future—even as other na-
tions continue to develop similar capabilities. 

I  also  need  your  help  to  effectively  transition  key  elements  of  our  Space  Shuttle 
workforce, infrastructure, and equipment to our Nation’s exploration objectives. The 
provisions  I  referenced  earlier,  as  well  as  stable  funding,  will  help  ensure  we  pre-
serve  a  critical  and  unique  industrial  base  capability  that  has  allowed  the  United 
States to lead the world in space exploration. 

Again,  thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  appear  before  you  today.  I  would  be 

pleased to respond to any questions that you may have.

Senator NELSON. Thank you, Dr. Griffin. 
Senator Stevens, if you need to leave, go ahead. 
Senator STEVENS. You’re very kind. 
As I listened to you, I think you’re right, in your last statement. 
But,  you  know,  we  have  never  made  it  available  to  the  public  to 
express  their  support,  in  terms  of  space  bonds.  Have  you  ever  ex-
plored  the  concept  of  some  space  bonds  so  that  we  could  purchase 
them  and  leave  them  to  our  grandchildren  or  something  to  collect, 
at  a  very  low  rate  of  interest?  I  think  everyone  in  the  country 
would  contribute  to  keeping  us  in  space.  But  the  ability  to  get  all 
the needed money out of the budget is almost impossible. 

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  Yes,  sir,  I  understand.  We’ve  not  looked  at  space 
bonds. I don’t think that’s within our authorization. That would be 
a prerogative of the Congress. 

Senator STEVENS. What would you think about it? 
Dr.  GRIFFIN.  I  think,  as  you  think,  sir.  I  think  most  Americans 
would be willing to buy such things to contribute to the space pro-
gram. I mean, Americans have bought government bonds for many 
other important initiatives. I believe many would do so for this one. 

Senator STEVENS. Thank you. 
Senator HUTCHISON. Let’s work on it. That’s great. 
Let  me  say  thank  you  for  always  shooting  straight.  Sometimes 

I don’t like the message, but you always shoot straight. 

Dr. GRIFFIN. I’m sorry, Senator. 
Senator HUTCHISON. But I know that when you say you’re going 
to do something, you do it, also. Let me ask you a couple of things. 
We  had  a  very  important  meeting,  Senator  Nelson  and  I,  with 
you  and  the  appropriations  staff,  because  I  was  alarmed  at  what 
the  Appropriations  Committee  did,  without  our  acquiescence,  in 
cutting  back  on  certain  programs  and  adding  certain  programs  in 
NASA  without  ever  having  a  hearing,  without  ever  consulting  us. 
And  we  were  very  concerned.  However,  the  appropriations  staff 
person  made  it  very  clear  that  you  had  the  ability  to  transfer  ac-
cording to need, and that you would have the flexibility to cover the 
priorities that you saw. 

I  wanted  to  ask  you  if  you  are  seeing  that  in  actuality?  Do  you 
feel that you are able to cover some of those costs for the Crew Ex-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:31 Jun 08, 2007 Jkt 034851 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34851.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

19

ploration Vehicle, continuation of its early—not production, but the 
early  research  and  development?  And  do  you  feel  comfortable  that 
you have the flexibility that was described? 

Dr. GRIFFIN. Senator, no, I don’t think we have a lot of flexibility. 
The  programmatic  instruction  in  the  FY07  bill  is  very  clear.  We 
have  a  $545-million,  in  round  numbers,  cut  for  all  of  NASA.  That 
cut  is  administered  in  particular  ways  that  result  in  taking  about 
$675 million out of human spaceflight in order to produce increases 
in other areas or smaller reductions in other areas. So, no, I cannot 
sit  here  and  say  that  I  feel  that  I’ve  been  granted  much  flexibility 
by the Congress in apportioning that money. 

Senator HUTCHISON. Well, was that your impression in the meet-
ing,  that  you  would  not  have  that  flexibility?  Or  were  you  hearing 
what I thought he was saying, and suggesting language that would 
give you that flexibility? 

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  I  was  in  that  meeting  with  you.  I  was  not  certain 
what  really  could  be  inferred  from  it.  But  a  careful  reading  of  the 
law  tells  us  that  I  do  not,  in  fact—we  have  taken  a  nearly  $700-
million cut in human spaceflight in order to address a $545-million 
cut  across  the  agency.  And  the  language  is  most  specific.  And  I  do 
not feel that I have much flexibility. I think my assistant just made 
the  point  that  we  do  have  a  certain  amount  of  flex  on  the  institu-
tional side to address the needs of full-cost accounting. So, with re-
gard  to  our  accounting  system,  we  do  have  flexibility.  Of  course, 
that  is  very  helpful,  because  we  have  changed  our  accounting  ap-
proach this year. But I do not have programmatic flexibility. 

Senator  HUTCHISON.  So,  have  you  had  to  slow  down  the  Crew 

Exploration Vehicle buildup? 

of the Crew Exploration Vehicle. 

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  Yes,  Senator.  We  will  be  slowing  the  development 

Senator HUTCHISON. Well, I’m very disappointed to hear that, be-
cause  it  was  my  impression  that  the  appropriations  staff  person 
was  saying  that  you  would  have  the  flexibility  to  continue  the  pri-
orities,  which  have  been  human  spaceflight,  and  that  continu-
ation——

Senator  NELSON.—Senator  Hutchison,  let  me  interrupt  here  to 
ask  a  question.  Wasn’t  that  administrative  flexibility  about  $200 
million, Dr. Griffin? 

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  I  need  to  distinguish  between  accounting  flexibility 
and  programmatic  flexibility.  I  do  not  have  the  flexibility  to  move 
money  from  one  area  to  another.  For  example,  I  do  not  have  the 
flexibility  to  minimize  the  delays  to  the  Crew  Exploration  Vehicle, 
other  than  by  taking  other  human  spaceflight  money.  And  I  don’t 
have extra money in the Shuttle and Station accounts, as you well 
know——

Senator HUTCHISON. Right. 
Dr. GRIFFIN.—so, I do not have that flexibility. 
Senator  NELSON.—Excuse  me  for  interrupting,  but  wasn’t  there 
one  program  that  you  told  us,  for  example,  in  the  development  of 
the heat shield, that you could take out of exploration and put into 
aeronautics? 

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  Although  we  were  always  planning  to  do  this—we 
can, and will, use our Aeronautics Research Mission Directorate to 
help  with  the  development  of  the  reentry  heat  shield  for  the  Crew 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:31 Jun 08, 2007 Jkt 034851 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34851.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

20

Exploration  Vehicle.  It  was  always  planned  that  they  would  do 
that.  I  mean,  the  Aeronautics  Research  Mission  Directorate  is 
where  that  work  would  be  done,  and  specifically  at  the  Ames  Re-
search  Center,  is  the  headquarters  for  that.  The  question  is,  who 
pays  for  it?  In  years  where  aeronautics  received  less  funding,  we 
would  have  had  the  Exploration  Systems  Mission  Directorate  pay 
for  it.  In  this  year,  we  would  contemplate  having  the  Aeronautics 
Research  Mission  Directorate  help  pay  for  it.  That  is  helpful.  That 
is helpful. So, there’s no change in the work. It’s always been aero-
nautics  work,  and  it  was  always  planned  to  be  done.  The  aero-
nautics account can help pay for that, yes. 

Senator HUTCHISON. So, that’s——
Dr. GRIFFIN. That is a help. 
Senator  HUTCHISON.  But  you’re  still  going  to  have  a  slowdown? 
Dr.  GRIFFIN.  As  I  said  a  moment  ago,  the  net  result  of  the  de-
crease will be a 4- to 6-month delay, as best we can tell, in delivery 
of the Orion Crew Vehicle. 

Senator HUTCHISON. I would like to ask you if you would give me 
the  detail  of  how  much  you  would  need  in  transferability  to  con-
tinue the Crew Exploration Vehicle—I don’t know—is the research 
or engineering——

Dr. GRIFFIN. Right, it’s——
Senator  HUTCHISON.—or  planning  or  development  stage—how 
much  would  you  need  transferred  back  in  order  to  fulfill  the 
timeline,  if  you  were  able  to  start  in  a  month  or  so,  and  have  the 
rest of this fiscal year? 

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  I’ll  have  to  take  that  question  for  the  record,  but 
we’ll  get  you  the  information  on  the  money  needed  to  remain  on 
schedule,  where  we  were  before.  It  would  be  approximately  the 
amount which was reduced this year, because most of the reduction 
came from that account. But we will get you that information. 

[The information referred to follows:]
Based on the technical baseline and flight tests planned for the Orion Crew Explo-
ration  Vehicle  (CEV)  and  the  Ares  I  Crew  Launch  Vehicle  (CLV)  and  the  current 
projected  budget  available  for  Constellation  Systems,  NASA’s  estimate  for  the  CEV 
Initial  Operational  Capability  (IOC)  is  September  2015,  with  a  schedule  variance 
around  this  IOC  date  of  approximately  4  months  based  on  NASA’s  cost  estimates. 
This CEV IOC date may be moved up if we delete other activities in the exploration 
budget to shore up funding for the CEV and CLV. Further, this projected IOC date 
is  based  on  the  NASA  Exploration  Systems  budget  resources  not  eroding  below  the 
current  five-year  runout  or  being  re-directed  to  other  activities.  Initial  Operational 
Capability  (IOC)  for  the  Orion  and  Ares  I  launch  vehicle  is  defined  here  as  the 
major  milestone  when  test  pilot  astronauts  fly  the  CEV  for  the  first  time  to  the 
International Space Station to conduct full-up testing of the new spacecraft. This is 
not  planned  to  he  a  crew  rotation  flight.  The  second  major  milestone  is  Full  Oper-
ational  Capability  (FOC)  when  the  CEV  and  CLV  will  be  capable  of  transporting 
crew  to  the  International  Space  Station,  remaining  at  the  Station  for  up  to  180 
days, and safely returning a crew to Earth. This FOC is projected to occur approxi-
mately one year following IOC of the CEV and CLV. 

In  order  to  meet  a  CEV  IOC  of  2014,  NASA  would  require  additional  funds  in 
the  out-years  to  meet  that  IOC  schedule  with  a  65  percent  cost  confidence  level  in 
our  budgeting.  The  ideal  time  phasing  of  such  funds  would  he  approximately  $350 
million in FY 2009 and an additional $400 million in FY 2010, though funding from 
FY  2008  may  be  obligated  in  FY  2008  and  FY  2009  to  the  CEV  and  CLV  develop-
ment. The schedule variance around the IOC date is approximately 4 months, based 
on NASA’s cost estimates.

Senator HUTCHISON. All right, thank you very much. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:31 Jun 08, 2007 Jkt 034851 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34851.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

21

Senator NELSON. May I interject right there? Now, let me get the 
math.  $700  million  minus  $200  million  that  you  have  in  flexibility 
administration,  so  that’s  $500  million.  So,  $500  million,  you’re  in 
deficit for the Fiscal Year. But the Fiscal Year started October the 
1st.  This  is  now  the  end  of  February.  So,  there  is  7  months  left  of 
the  Fiscal  Year.  So,  7/12ths  of  $500  million  is  something  around 
$300  million.  Is  that  a  ballpark  of  what  you  would  need  juiced  up 
for this fiscal year? 

Dr. GRIFFIN. Well, I think we’re mixing apples and oranges here, 
because,  again,  the  institutional  flexibility  is  mostly  involved  with 
the  spreading  of  agency  overhead,  OK,  among  our  accounts.  Every 
business  has  direct  costs  and  overhead.  So,  when  we  talk  about 
flexibility, we do have the flexibility to apportion the overhead cor-
rectly,  in  accordance  with  our  accounting  roles.  We  don’t  have  the 
flexibility  to  move  direct  funding.  With  all  due  respect,  Senator 
Hutchison asked for an answer, on the record, that gives the right 
amount of money, and I can’t do that in my head, so I’d rather pro-
vide that to you offline. 

Senator NELSON. We’re trying to help you. 
Dr.  GRIFFIN.  I  know,  Senator.  Let  me  try  to  get  at  it  another 
way.  Increases  were  provided  to  facilities  and  aeronautics.  Small 
decreases  were  taken  in  our  science  account—much  less  than  the 
percentage  of  the  cut  we  had.  In  order  to  allow  the  rest  of  that  to 
happen,  we  had  to  take  nearly  $700  million  out  of  human 
spaceflight.  Almost  all  of  that  came  from  the  Orion  Crew  Explo-
ration  Vehicle,  which  is  now  in  development.  Senator,  you  were 
asking  about  research  or  whatever.  It’s  in  the  development  stage. 
We’ve selected a contractor. They’re busy working away, as are the 
folks  at  the  NASA  field  centers.  So,  in  truth,  there  isn’t  enough 
transfer  authority  to  make  up  that  much  money,  because  that 
amount of money was bigger than the cut we took. 

Senator HUTCHISON. But you do have the offset of what is being 

done within aeronautics. 

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  There  is  some  work  that  can  be  done  on  the  heat 
shield,  and  is  being  done  in  the  Aeronautics  Research  Mission  Di-
rectorate, but it isn’t $200 million worth of work, by any stretch of 
the imagination. 

Senator HUTCHISON. Well, that’s why I would like to have the ac-

curate——

Dr. GRIFFIN. Yes. 
Senator HUTCHISON.—number, because maybe——
Dr. GRIFFIN. Exactly. 
Senator  HUTCHISON.—we  would  have  another  way  to  restore 

some of that——

Dr. GRIFFIN. Exactly. 
Senator HUTCHISON.—through a supplemental. 
Dr. GRIFFIN. I will get you that. I certainly know that you’re try-
ing to help. And I’m trying to help you. But, you know, the bottom 
line is that we’re down over half a billion dollars, and most of that 
came from the Shuttle replacement vehicles. 

I would emphasize, I know that all of you know this, but, for the 
record,  I  want  to  make  the  point  that  many  have  said,  ‘‘I’m  not 
worried  about  the  Moon  right  now.’’  And  I  would  say  to  them, 
‘‘Well,  I’m  not  worried  about  the  Moon  right  now,  either.  I’m  wor-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:31 Jun 08, 2007 Jkt 034851 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34851.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

22

ried  about  replacing  the  Shuttle.’’  The  budget  cuts  we  have  taken 
largely  come  out  of  replacing  the  Shuttle.  And  I  will  get  you  the 
exact figures. 

Senator  HUTCHISON.  Thank  you.  And  I  have  another  question, 

but, since Senator Dorgan has not yet questioned, I will defer. 

Senator  NELSON.  Before  I  turn  to  Senator  Dorgan,  are  your  fig-
ures  calculating  that  you’re  going  to  be  reimbursed  for  the  money 
that you spent on hurricane repairs? 

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  We  have  asked  for  transfer  authority.  As  I  think 
you  know,  we  took  money  out  of  the  Shuttle  and  Station  accounts 
to  pay  for  the  Hurricane  Katrina  repairs.  We’ve  asked  for  transfer 
authority  to  be  able  to  pay  that  back  from  the  Hurricane  Katrina 
supplemental  that  we  did  receive.  That  money  is  not  involved,  ei-
ther  way,  with  the  exploration  account.  So,  that  was  money  that 
came out of Shuttle and Station. We’d like to put it back in Shuttle 
and Station. 

Senator NELSON. And how much money is that? 
Dr. GRIFFIN. I will have to get you that for the record. 
[The information referred to follows:]
Total  Katrina  requirements  are  currently  estimated  at  $432.4  million,  made  up 
of  $384.8  million  in  direct  Katrina-related  requirements  and  $47.6  million  in  Shut-
tle/ISS payback needs.

• MAF—$181.0 million 
• SSC—$197.2 million 
• NSSC—$3.2 million 
• Other—$3.4 million 
• Shuttle/ISS Payback—$47.6 million
The $384.8 million in total direct Katrina requirements includes all Center recov-
ery  and  operations  activities  and  all  high  priority  catastrophic  loss  mitigation 
projects, approved as of November 1, 2006. 

The $47.6 million in Shuttle/ISS payback needs reflects a reduction from NASA’s 
earlier  figure  of  $54  million,  a  result  of  the  September  2006  reprogramming  to  the 
ISS  program  of  $6.4  million  in  Shuttle/ISS  funds  loaned  for  Katrina  needs,  which 
had not yet been spent. 

NASA currently has funding availability of $432.4 million to meet Katrina-related 

requirements:

• $384.8 million in supplemental funding from P.L. 109–148 ($349.8 million) and 

Pub. L. 109–234 ($35.0 million)

• $47.6 million loaned from Shuttle/ISS programs (already obligated)
NASA  is  seeking  to  transfer  up  to  $48  million  from  the  $384.8  million  in  emer-
gency supplemental funds to pay back the remaining Shuttle/ISS loan. The ISS pro-
gram  has  content  requirements  in  excess  of  budget  availability  in  FY  2007  due  to 
budget reductions over the past several years and impacts of the Columbia accident. 
This has resulted in a negative ISS reserve posture (more requirements and threats 
than available funding) for FY 2007, which ISS is closely monitoring. These negative 
reserves are currently booked in Operations and the program may have to consider 
potential content reductions in order to execute the next Fiscal Year. Payback to ISS 
for  Katrina  would  go  to  ISS  Operations  to  help  implement  the  current  program  re-
quirements  and  reduce  the  risk  of  potential  content  deletions,  which  could  prevent 
the  program  from  meeting  its  International  Partner  commitments  and  supporting 
the  Vision  for  Space  Exploration.  The  Space  Shuttle  Program  (SSP)  requires  the 
payback  of  funds  to  mitigate  both  schedule  and  operational  risk  in  FY  2007.  The 
SSP is also projecting more requirements and threats than available funding, which 
reduces  its  programmatic  ability  to  deal  with  unexpected  requirements.  Proposed 
language  is  as  follows:  ‘‘Up  to  $48,000,000  of  amounts  made  available  to  the  Na-
tional  Aeronautics  and  Space  Administration  in  Public  Law  109–148  and  Public 
Law  109–234  for  emergency  hurricane  and  other  natural  disaster-related  expenses 
may be used to reimburse hurricane-related costs incurred by NASA in Fiscal Year 
2005.’’

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:31 Jun 08, 2007 Jkt 034851 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34851.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

23

If  $47.6  million  were  transferred  from  the  supplemental  funds  to  repay  the  re-
maining  Shuttle/ISS  loan,  the  total  available  funding  remaining  for  Katrina  would 
be $384.8 million. the same amount as appropriated in the emergency supplemental 
measures.  The  full  amount  of  $384.8  million  would  still  be  available  for  Katrina 
needs;  no  content  would  be  affected  by  the  transfer.  NASA  is  able  to  fund  all 
Katrina  recovery  and  operations  activities  as  well  as  all  high  priority  catastrophic 
loss  mitigation  projects  and  still  repay  remaining  borrowed  Shuttle/ISS  funds  if 
transfer authority is provided by Congress.

Senator NELSON. But whatever that is, it’s some tens of millions. 
Dr. GRIFFIN. Oh, many tens of millions, yes. 
Senator  NELSON.  Well,  then,  that’s  newfound  money,  isn’t  it? 

That would go into the Shuttle account. 

Dr. GRIFFIN. Correct. 
Senator  NELSON.  Well,  then,  that’s  like  additional  money  that 
you  wouldn’t  absolutely  have.  What  we’d  like  you  to  come  up  with 
is a figure that is realistic that we could go out and try to find for 
you,  so  you  can  keep  on  the  schedule  of  2014  or  earlier  for  Orion/
Ares. 

Dr. GRIFFIN. We will do that. 
Senator HUTCHISON. Exactly. 
Senator NELSON. Senator Dorgan? 

STATEMENT OF HON. BYRON L. DORGAN,

U.S. SENATOR FROM NORTH DAKOTA 

Senator DORGAN. Mr. Chairman, thank you very much. 
Dr.  Griffin,  thank  you  for  being  here.  You  don’t  lift  off  from 
North  Dakota.  I  don’t  have  a  large  population  of  employees  up  in 
my  part  of  the  country,  but  I’m  interested  in  NASA,  and  I  espe-
cially am interested in the last comment you made, because I share 
that sentiment. I think when a society stops exploring, it stops pro-
gressing.  I  just  think  it’s  very  important  for  us  to  continue  to  ex-
plore,  and  space  exploration  is  very  important  in  that  exploration. 
I  especially  became  interested,  in  the  last  decade,  in  the  concept 
of  Mission  to  Planet  Earth,  which  NASA  was  very  interested  in, 
and  that  is  developing  the  massive—or  the  substantial  amount  of 
information  that  you  collect  and  create,  and  using  it  for  beneficial 
purposes  here  on  Earth.  And  so,  that  is  one  of  the  things  that’s 
piqued my interest, as well. 

Let  me  ask  about  the  budget  request,  just  for  a  moment.  And, 
if  I  might,  the  $545  million  that  you’re  losing  is  from  the  Presi-
dent’s 2007 request. 

Dr. GRIFFIN. Yes, sir. 
Senator  DORGAN.  Our  funding,  though,  in  the  continuing  resolu-

tion, is a continuation of the 2006 level, isn’t it? 

Dr. GRIFFIN. That’s correct. 
Senator  DORGAN.  And  so,  you  will  not  replace  the  $545  million 
that  was  requested  in  2007,  because  we’re  not  going  to  have  an-
other  opportunity  on  that.  We  passed  a  CR  at  the  2006  level,  and 
the  Chairman  is  right  that  we’re  5  months  into  the  fiscal  Year. 
Seven  months  remain,  but  the  $545  million  comes  off  of  the  2007 
request, rather than the CR, which embodies the 2006-level exten-
sion. So, you will have lost all of the $545 million for the fiscal year 
and not recapture that. I think that’s your concern. 

Dr. GRIFFIN. That was part of the point I was making. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:31 Jun 08, 2007 Jkt 034851 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34851.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

24

Senator  DORGAN.  What  I  don’t  understand  is,  your  loss  of  $545 
million from the 2007 request, how that relates to the $677 million 
that you were directed in reductions to human spaceflight. Can you 
explain that to me? Because I don’t understand that. 

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  I  can  best  illustrate  by  saying  what  I  normally 
would  have  done  if  given  a  reduction  in  planned  spending  because 
of  a  continuing  resolution.  I  would  have  normally  apportioned  it 
approximately  in  accord  with  the  way  money  is  spent  within  the 
agency.  Roughly  60  percent  of  our  money  is  spent  on  human 
spaceflight, so I would have taken a cut of 60 percent of $545 mil-
lion and applied it to human spaceflight. Thirty-two percent of our 
money goes to science; I would have cut science by 32 percent, and 
done  so  in  a  pro  rata  fashion.  I  was  not  provided  that  flexibility. 
Other  portfolios  within  NASA  were  either  increased  or  were  cut 
only  slightly,  and  the  human  spaceflight  account  was  decremented 
quite  severely  to  make  up  for  that.  So,  the  cuts  were  not  applied 
in a pro rata fashion according to how we spend the money within 
the agency. 

Senator  HUTCHISON.  That  language  was  changed,  in  the  con-
tinuing  resolution,  from  the  Senate-passed  bill  and  the  authoriza-
tion that came out of this Committee. 

Senator DORGAN. Let me ask, with respect to the Orion Crew Ex-
ploration  Vehicle,  can  you  tell  me  the  timeline  and  the  estimated 
costs of that project? 

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  The  estimated  cost  of  the  project  is  in  the  $10-bil-
lion,  9-point-something—and  it  was  intended  to  deliver  human 
flight-quality  hardware  not  later  than  2014.  In  fact,  we  were  aim-
ing for 2014. 

Senator DORGAN. And you indicated, today, you’ve slipped that 6 

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  With  this  cut,  we  will  slip  4  to  6  months,  on  an—
if  nothing  else  changed,  apples-to-apples  basis,  we’d  slip  4  to  6 
months. 

Senator  DORGAN.  And  how  many  Shuttle  flights  will  occur  be-

tween now and that period of time? 

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  Well,  the  Shuttle  will  be  retired  in  2010.  We  have 

months? 

about 13–14 flights to go. 

of your work? 

ask about anything. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Can  I  ask  you  about  the  Earth  science  portion 

Dr. GRIFFIN. You are the Senator, and I am the witness. You can 

[Laughter.] 
Senator DORGAN. All right, then, let me start each question with, 

‘‘How do you justify’’—no, I won’t do that. 

Let  me  ask  you  about  the  science  portion  of  your  budget.  As  I 
indicated,  there  are  many  Members  of  Congress  that  don’t  offer  a 
home  in  their  home  state  to  the  dedicated  people  in  your  agency, 
but  we’re  very  interested  in  the  opportunity  that  your  science  pro-
grams  offer  the  rest  of  the  country.  Give  me  your  assessment  of 
that.  I  know  that  some  of  the  priorities  have  changed  in  recent 
years  in  NASA,  but  give  me  your  sense  of  the  Earth  science  pro-
grams. 

Dr. GRIFFIN. Well, the science program, as a whole, is an extraor-
dinary American accomplishment. It is just extraordinary. It is also 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:31 Jun 08, 2007 Jkt 034851 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34851.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

25

cooperative, internationally. It’s one of the best things we do to ad-
vance  international  cooperation.  Something  like  two-thirds  of  our 
missions  have  an  international  component,  and  we  are  not  always 
the  leader;  sometimes  we  are  the  follower,  supplying  instruments 
on another country’s spacecraft. So, overall, our science program is 
just extraordinary. 

Now, with regard to Earth science, we have—and, as I mentioned 
in my opening remarks, we have four major portfolios. We have as-
trophysics,  as  exemplified  by  the  Hubble  Space  Telescope;  plan-
etary  science—I  think  you’re  familiar  with  the  Mars  Rovers; 
heliophysics on space science—you might not be familiar with par-
ticular missions there, but you might recall that, just a few months 
ago,  we  launched  the  STEREO  mission,  which  will  study  the  sun 
from  opposing  angles  around  it,  and  be  able  to  get  stereoscopic 
views  of  it,  and  help  us  understand  coronal  mass  ejections,  which 
are  our  key  to  space  weather  and  to  electrical  interference  with 
Earth;  and  then,  finally,  we  have  Earth  science.  So,  we  have  four 
portfolios. The Earth science portfolio occupies, in Fiscal Year 2008, 
27 percent of the budget, so just slightly over one-fourth. The Earth 
science portfolio is the section of NASA which is responsible for re-
turning all of the information on climate research, which you have 
seen much ballyhooed in the media lately on global warming. That 
is  NASA  work  that  has  produced  that  data,  and  we’re  quite  proud 
of it. 

The  Earth  science  program  had  fallen  on,  I  would  say,  difficult 
days,  a  few  years  ago.  Almost  the  first  thing  that  I  did  when  I  re-
turned  to  the  agency—as  I  think  you  know,  I’ve  been  with  NASA 
before  in  my  career—almost  the  first  thing  I  did  when  I  returned 
was  to  remove  a  planned  increase  for  the  robotic  Mars  program 
and  put  that  money  back  into  Earth  science  to  bring  the  Earth 
science  portfolio  up  to  the  levels  that  it  should  enjoy,  consistent 
with our other science mission portfolios. So, today it’s healthy. We 
have  also  a  very  recently  released  Decadal  Survey  for  Earth 
Sciences. We will use that to reshape our planning portfolio in the 
next  few  years.  We  have  a  recently  released  report  from  the  IPCC 
on their thoroughly scientific assessment of global warming, which 
I think will help to inform the debate. 

So, I’m actually pretty pleased with, and pretty proud of, the pro-

gram. And, you know, I think it’s in good shape. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Well,  I  want  NASA  to  succeed.  And  as  I  indi-
cated to you, I feel very strongly that our country needs to continue 
to explore and find the edges of exploration and science. 

Let  me,  finally,  ask  you  one  very  delicate  question.  Well,  you 
know that NASA was the subject of a 24/7 discussion about one in-
stance,  a  very  difficult  circumstance  with  an  astronaut,  a  former 
astronaut. And, frankly, watching all of that on television, it’s pret-
ty  depressing  to  watch  the  24/7  news  cycle  these  days—a  lot  like 
blackbirds  on  a  telephone  wire,  one  flies  on;  they  all  fly  on,  one 
flies  off,  they  all  fly  off.  And  in  this  circumstance,  there  was  a  lot 
of  publicity  about  a  former  NASA  astronaut.  I  watched  that,  and 
one  of  the  things  that  I  admired  is  other  NASA  astronauts  came 
and  spoke  publicly  and  said,  ‘‘We  worry  about  the  human  being 
here.’’  But  having  mentioned  that,  is  there  anything  in  that  cir-
cumstance,  or  anything  with  respect  to  what  you  saw  and  heard, 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:31 Jun 08, 2007 Jkt 034851 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34851.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

26

that  required  or  urged  you  to  think  about  any  changes  in 
screenings  or  any  other  aspect  of  training  and  seeking  astronauts? 
Dr.  GRIFFIN.  Well,  sir,  that  is  exactly  what  we  are  looking  at. 
The allegations against Captain Nowak are, of course, very serious. 
It’s  a  legal  matter.  It’s  in  the  legal  system.  I  just  will  not  address 
those  allegations.  But  clearly  she  is  in  major  trouble,  and  clearly 
we  failed,  as  an  institution,  to  recognize  that  she  was  very  trou-
bled.  So,  as  I  speak  to  you,  we  are  looking,  with  two  separate 
groups,  at  exactly  that  issue,  as  well  as  the  issue  of  prescreening 
and to continue screening. 

The  two  groups  are  drawn,  first  of  all,  from  across  the  Federal 
Government  from  other  high-performance,  high-stress  organiza-
tions  in  the  military  services,  from  the  aeromedical  or  other  med-
ical specialists, and then also a second group from inside NASA to 
look  at  how  we  support  our  astronauts.  When  results  from  those 
studies become available, you will have them. 

Senator  DORGAN.  All  right.  I  should  hasten  to  say,  I  don’t  mean 
to  suggest  that  was  not  a  news  story.  It  clearly  was  a  news  story, 
and  clearly  the  charges  are  serious.  But  it  was  very  high  profile, 
simply  because  it  was  an  astronaut  who  had  recently  flown  on  a 
mission. 

I  thank  you  for  the  response.  I  hope  you’ll  share  what  you  have 

learned, with the Committee, when you learn it. 

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  We  absolutely  will.  I  would  like  to  close  that  par-
ticular question by noting that I have known and worked with our 
astronauts  for  the  better  part  of  30  years,  in  one  capacity  or  an-
other,  and  they  are,  of  course,  highly  selected  and  highly  filtered, 
and  extremely  capable,  and  extremely  conscientious,  and  I  don’t 
think one incident should ever be allowed to paint a picture for an 
entire  group  of  people,  for  any  group,  and  certainly  not  for  our  as-
tronauts. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Well,  I’ve  met  many  of  them,  and  they  are  an 
unbelievable  group  of  American  men  and  women,  courageous.  And 
we  certainly  wouldn’t  want  to  disparage  astronauts  in  the  sight  of 
one  who’s  flown  here,  as  well,  the  Chairman  of  our  Subcommittee. 
Let me thank you, Dr. Griffin. And I’m anxious to work with you 
and  the  folks  in  NASA  to  see  that  you  succeed  in  your  missions. 

Dr. GRIFFIN. Thank you, Senator Dorgan. 
Senator NELSON. Senator Dorgan, since you are a member of the 
Appropriations  Committee,  one  of  the  things  that  maybe  you,  Sen-
ator Mikulski, and Senator Hutchison could all explore is language 
that  would  give  additional  flexibility,  coming  up  on  this  vehicle 
that we’re going to consider in a couple of weeks on moving money 
from one account to another. 

Dr. Griffin—Senator Hutchison, you want to continue on? 
Senator HUTCHISON. Yes. 
Senator  NELSON.  I’ve  got  a  bunch  of  questions,  and  I  don’t  want 

to hold you up. 

Senator HUTCHISON. OK. Let me ask one. 
Senator NELSON. You go ahead. 
Senator  HUTCHISON.  All  right,  thank  you.  I  just  have  one,  and 
that  is  the  Alpha  Magnetic  Spectrometer  (AMS)  that  we  have  dis-
cussed, that Dr. Sam Ting is working on, both in Switzerland, and 
other countries, and would like to have the spectrometer go on the 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:31 Jun 08, 2007 Jkt 034851 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34851.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

27

Space  Station,  because  it  is  his  contention,  as  we  had  heard  from 
him  in  this  very  Committee  last  year,  that  he  thinks  the  study  of 
cosmic  rays  and  the  dark  matter  could  have  a  potential  impact  on 
our  future  energy  sources.  And  the  Department  of  Energy  has, 
since  that  hearing  that  we  had,  validated  his  contention  that  it 
would have a strong scientific basis. My question is, since it is not 
on the list of priority pieces of equipment that would be in the last 
of  the  Shuttles,  which  I  think  you’ve  already  designated,  is  there 
any  other  way  that  that  piece  of  equipment  could  be  taken  to  the 
Space  Station,  perhaps  through  other  agencies  or  private  funding? 
And do you think it would be worth pursuing that for the scientific 
work that could be done once the Space Station is completed? 

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  I’m  certainly  not  able  to  comment  on  private  fund-
ing  sources  or  what  other  agencies  can  do.  I  need  to  stay  in  my 
running lane. Yes, of course, the Alpha Magnetic Spectrometer can 
be  put  in  space  by  other  means  than  the  Shuttle.  We’ve  analyzed 
that  problem  fairly  carefully,  and,  if  it  were  put  on  an  Atlas  or 
Delta EELV, Air Force Expendable Vehicle, it would take us about 
$350  million,  we  estimate,  to  buy  that  launch  and  to  outfit  it  with 
the  necessary  automated  docking  mechanisms.  The  automated 
docking  mechanisms  would  be  very  similar  to  what  the  European 
ATV  or  the  Japanese  HTV  will  use  when  they  dock  with  the  Sta-
tion. So, certainly it can be done, but it’s the $350 million. Just as 
Shuttle  flights,  following  Columbia,  are  now  a  nonrenewable  re-
source—I  have  a  very  limited  number  of  Shuttle  flights  available 
to  finish  building  the  Station,  and  so,  I  just  simply  can’t  add  a 
Shuttle  flight—so,  also,  I  don’t  have  $350  million  to  put  that  pay-
load into space by alternate means. 

Senator  HUTCHISON.  Is  it  totally  foreclosed  that  that  would  be 
able  to  go  up  on  a  Shuttle  when  you  are  taking  something  else  in 
this group that you have in the schedule? 

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  The  Alpha  Magnetic  Spectrometer  weighs  many 
tons,  and  we  have  looked  carefully,  believe  me.  The  Alpha  Mag-
netic  Spectrometer  flight  is  one  of  the  many  examples  of  collateral 
damage  to  the  Nation’s  space  program  which  followed  the  loss  of 
Columbia.  It  is  very  visible.  I  know  it  is  very  visible  to  you.  But 
there have been many other things we lost as a result of that acci-
dent.  We  are  still  digging  out  of  that  hole,  leaving  entirely  aside, 
of  course,  the  tragedy  of  losing  seven  crew  members.  The  Alpha 
Magnetic Spectrometer is one of those losses. We have looked very 
carefully  to  see  whether  it  could  be  co-manifested  with  any  other 
piece of Space Station hardware, and to go up in that fashion. But, 
as  you  know,  the  pieces  of  Space  Station  hardware  that  we  have 
are,  themselves,  large  and  voluminous.  We  just  can’t  fit  the  AMS 
in with the Space Station hardware. Other than the Hubble flight, 
which  needs  the  whole  cargo  bay—the  Hubble  servicing  mission, 
sorry—needs every bit of payload we can get to get to the right alti-
tude—we  have  no  other  Shuttle  missions  available  that  don’t  take 
up  Space  Station  hardware.  So,  all  of  our  missions  are  devoted  ei-
ther  to  servicing  the  Hubble  or  to  building  the  Space  Station,  and 
all of the ones devoted to building the Space Station have too much 
hardware in the cargo bay to put the AMS in. So, we just can’t get 
there from here. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:31 Jun 08, 2007 Jkt 034851 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34851.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

28

Senator  HUTCHISON.  And  there’s  no  outside  source  that  would 
probably  consider  the  $350  million  able  to  be  recovered  from  the 
science? 

Dr. GRIFFIN. I’m not aware of one. Of course, I’m an engineer and 
not a scientist. I know that Dr. Ting has much broader connections 
in the science community than I will ever have. And I am told that 
the  science  is  good  science.  I’m  simply  not  casting  any  aspersions 
on  it  at  all.  But  if  no  other  science  agency  or  entity  has  stepped 
up to say that they want to fund it, then I would assume that they 
don’t think that it is capable of being funded. 

The  AMS  was  approved—I  know  you  know  this,  but,  for  the 
record, before we lost Columbia, the entire logistical support of the 
Space  Station  was  to  be  by  means  of  the  Shuttle.  So,  there  were 
many Shuttle flights that would go up for crew rotation or to bring 
consumables, which had a lot of extra payload capacity. So, in that 
sense,  transport  aboard  the  Space  Shuttle  was  a  free  good.  It  was 
a  free  thing  that  we  could  offer  to  worthy  payloads.  The  AMS  was 
one of those. In the post-Columbia world, transportation aboard the 
Shuttle is not a free good. It is an extraordinarily limited resource. 
If we are to finish the Space Station in the manner that you spoke 
of  in  your  opening  remarks,  every  Shuttle  flight  that  I  have  left 
has  got  to  be  used  for  the  Station.  Then,  last  year’s  legislation, 
2006  legislation,  made  one  exception  to  that,  in  law—was  the 
Hubble servicing mission, directing us to spend $293 million to con-
tinue  with  that  mission,  if  it  were  possible  to  fly  it.  As  you  know, 
I  spent  a  lot  of  personal  time—not  just  agency  time,  but  personal 
time—involved in the study of whether or not the Hubble servicing 
mission  was  technically  possible,  given  the  new  rules  under  which 
we  fly  Shuttles.  We  came  to  the  conclusion  that  it  was,  and  that 
is the only non-Space Station exception, at this point. 

Senator HUTCHISON. Thank you. 
Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Dr.  GRIFFIN.  Thank  you,  Senator.  And  I’m  very  sorry,  but  that 

is the answer. 

Senator  NELSON.  And  according  to  your  answer  on  AMS,  the 

same would be true of the Deep Space Climate Observatory? 

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  You’ve  caught  me  at  a  loss.  I  don’t  know  what  the 
Deep  Space  Climate  Observatory  is;  but,  if  it  was  intended  to  go 
up on a Shuttle, it isn’t now. 

Senator  NELSON.  It  was.  It  was  engineered  to  go  in  the  payload 

bay. In fact, it is a completed spacecraft. 

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  Oh,  I  believe  you’re  talking  about  what  used  to  be 

called Triana. 

Senator NELSON. That’s correct. 
Dr.  GRIFFIN.  I’m  sorry.  I  disconnected  on  the  acronym.  Excuse 
me. Yes, sir, if we were to fly DSCOVR, it would have to go on an 
expendable  vehicle.  There  would  have  to  be  some  reengineering 
done  to  it,  because  expendable  vehicle  loads  are  substantially 
greater  than  the  Shuttle,  as  you,  of  course,  know.  So,  it  was  de-
signed  for  Shuttle  launch.  So,  the  entire  loads  environment  would 
be  different.  So,  there  would  be  money  to  spent  there.  Then,  we 
would have to buy the expendable vehicle. So, I think, there again, 
you’re  talking  about  at  least  a  couple  of  hundred,  maybe  several 
hundred million dollars to fly that particular spacecraft. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:31 Jun 08, 2007 Jkt 034851 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34851.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

29

Senator  NELSON.  Picking  up  on  Senator  Hutchison’s  comment 
about private entrepreneurs offering a ride, one thing that you are 
looking at is the ability to send crew or cargo to the Station during 
the gap. 

Dr. GRIFFIN. Yes, sir. 
Senator NELSON. Instead of relying just on the Russian Soyuz or 
the European ATV, which, itself, hasn’t flown. You have this COTS 
contract,  the  Commercial  Orbital  Transportation  System.  Talk  to 
us about that. 

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  I’m  happy  to,  Senator.  That  particular  effort  is  my 

initiative, so, if it fails, you’ll know where to look. 

The genesis of that effort lies with the observation that, over the 
decades  of  space  development—in  contrast  to  aviation,  where  we 
had a strong public-private synergy, a lot of private money in avia-
tion  during  the  hundred  years  of  its  development  to  its  present 
state,  and  a  lot  of  public  money—in  space,  we  have  pretty  much 
only  had  public  money  and  public  programs,  civil  or  defense,  but 
all  funded  by  the  American  taxpayer.  We’ve  had  relatively  little 
private space development. 

I believe that that fact is responsible for a slower growth of space 
capability than we witnessed in the development of aviation. Many 
private  concerns  have  said  that,  if  the  government  would  provide 
a  certain  amount  of  seed  money,  that  they  could  attract  other  pri-
vate capital, and that they would be able to develop basic space in-
frastructure—transportation  to  and  from  low  Earth  orbit,  if  the 
government would provide seed capital, they could provide such ca-
pability at costs much lower than the government could provide. 

I  don’t  think  any  amongst  us  would  believe  the  proposition  that 
the government is the most efficient provider of goods and services. 
So, if such commercial space capability could be brought into being, 
I  think  that  most  of  us  believe  it  would  be  more  efficient  than  the 
government, and, therefore, a good deal. 

In  my  tenure,  another  of  those  things  that  I  started  very  early, 
we  set  aside  some  money—about  half  a  billion  dollars  over  the  5-
year runout—we set aside some money to be used as seed money—
not  enough  money  for  the  development  of  this  commercial  capa-
bility,  but  seed  money—to  help  the  winning  companies  attract 
other capital. We labeled it the Commercial Orbital Transportation 
Services (COTS) program, as you duly noted. 

Over  the  course  of  the  last  year  or  so,  we  conducted  a  competi-
tion among all parties for two funded Space Act Agreements. Space 
Act  Agreements  fall  under  the  category  of  other  transactional  au-
thority,  like  the  DOD  has  in  many  areas  for  special  transactions 
that  are  not  what  you  would  classify  as  conventional  prime  con-
tracts  or  service  contracts.  They’re  other  transactional  authority 
that  is  granted  to  NASA  in  its  founding  legislation.  It  was  deter-
mined  by  our  Office  of  General  Counsel  that  the  Space  Act  Agree-
ment  was  an  appropriate  mechanism  to  conduct  this  particular 
piece of business. We held competitions. We found two winners. We 
have  awarded  the  money  to  the  two  winners.  They  are  now  busily 
about their business of seeking private capital to augment the gov-
ernment  capital  and  moving  down  the  road  to  advance  the  capa-
bility. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:31 Jun 08, 2007 Jkt 034851 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34851.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

30

We  certainly  hope  that  both  will  succeed,  but  this  is  not  some-
thing  over  which  the  government  has  control.  By  the  very  nature 
of an attempt to bring about commercial space capability, we must 
severely  restrict  our  oversight.  In  fact,  this  whole  question  of  the 
development  of  commercial  space  capability  comes  down  to  an  at-
tempt to answer the question, is the American aerospace industrial 
base  capable  of  developing  spaceflight  hardware  without  the  close 
oversight  of  the  U.S.  Government?  We  have  conducted  the  experi-
ment  to  know  that,  with  the  close  oversight  of  the  U.S.  Govern-
ment,  such  capability  is  possible.  The  question  is,  can  it  be  done 
on  an  arms’-length  basis?  I  believe  the  answer  to  that  is  yes,  and 
that  is  what  we’re  doing  with  the  COTS  contracts.  If  one  or  both 
are  successful,  in  a  few  years  we  will  be  able  to  transition  from 
Space  Act  Agreements  to  routine  purchases  of  commercial  service 
to low Earth orbit, and that is our hope. 

Senator  NELSON.  And  then,  you  would  have  to  have  the  govern-
ment  oversight,  because  it’s  going  to  interface  with  a  government 
facility, the Space Station. 

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  Well,  of  course.  We  try  to  do  that  through  appro-
priate  interface  requirements.  We  have  published  visiting-vehicle 
requirements for any vehicle which would wish to dock at the Sta-
tion.  We  have  certain  standards  on  human  rating  that  we  would 
apply.  But  those  are  known  in  advance  to  the  companies  devel-
oping  the  capability.  It’s  not  something  to  be  imposed  on  them  by 
surprise  at  the  last  moment.  I  mean,  the  government  has  stand-
ards  on  commercial  aviation,  as  you  well  know,  Senator.  So,  com-
mercial  airplanes  are  developed  with  those  standards  in  mind. 
That’s exactly what we’re doing in the space arena. 

Senator  NELSON.  If  successful,  would  that  be  a  source  of  a  ride 

for DSCOVR or for AMS? 

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  I  don’t  know,  but  I’m  initially  doubtful,  because 
both—well,  possibly  for  DSCOVR,  which  is  of  lower  mass.  AMS 
weighs  many  tons,  and  I’m  skeptical  that  that  particular  payload 
could be carried up. We are talking about a couple of tons of cargo 
for  this  commercial  space  capability  at  the  entry  level,  a  few  tons 
of  cargo.  We’re  talking  about  being  able  to  provide  crew  rotations 
for a few people. We’re not talking about the kind of mass that the 
AMS has. 

Senator NELSON. But possibly DSCOVR. 
Dr. GRIFFIN. Possibly. 
Senator  NELSON.  And  it  would  be  a  lot  cheaper  than  the  $350 

million you’re talking about to get on an Atlas or a Delta. 

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  Well,  certainly,  sir,  because  if  the  developed  com-
mercial  capability  was  not  cheaper  than  what  the  government 
could  do,  then  we  wouldn’t  purchase  it.  We  won’t  spend  more 
money than is necessary to buy a government capability. 

Senator  NELSON.  Let’s  go  back  to  the  gap,  which  you  now  say  is 

going to be early Fiscal Year 2015. 

Dr. GRIFFIN. As we project, today, yes, sir. 
Senator  NELSON.  So,  between  October  1,  2014,  and  sometime  in 

the first part of calendar year 2015 is what you’re projecting. 

Dr. GRIFFIN. That is what I’m projecting. 
Senator  NELSON.  What  do  you  think  is  going  to  be  the  impact 

upon the work force, both civil servants and contractors? 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:31 Jun 08, 2007 Jkt 034851 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34851.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

31

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  I  am  worried  about  it.  From  the  end  of  Fiscal  Year 
2010  until  early  in  Fiscal  Year  2015,  from  the  end  of  one  Shuttle 
period  to  the  onset  of  the  Orion  and  Ares  period,  our  human 
spaceflight  expertise  will  be  depleted,  to  a  certain  extent.  In  fact, 
if we kept all the same people onboard that we have today on Shut-
tle, we would obviously save no money, because, in the end, all the 
money  goes  to  pay  people  to  do  things  we  want  them  to  do.  Even 
when we buy hardware, we are paying other people in other places 
to make that hardware. 

Now, there would be fewer people involved in the Orion and Ares 
launch  systems  anyway,  because  we  intend  them  to  cost  less,  and 
we certainly want to divert some of that talent to other enterprises. 
But  when  you  don’t  fly  for  4  or  more  years,  people  become  stale; 
the very good people often move into other enterprises where there 
is more action; facilities degrade. It’s not a good thing. This Nation 
went through a period like that between the end of Apollo and the 
onset of Shuttle, and it was very damaging. I expect it will be dam-
aging again, which is why, with you, I have devoted a considerable 
amount  of  personal  energy  to  minimizing  that  gap.  The  funding 
that we have today supports flying in early 2015. That is about the 
best that I can offer you. 

Senator  NELSON.  Theoretically,  that  would  be  4  years;  October 
2010 until October, November, or December of 2014, because that’s 
Fiscal Year 2015. 

Dr. GRIFFIN. Sometime in early 2015 would be 4-plus years. 
Senator  NELSON.  What  are  the  strategic  implications  of  this  4-
year-plus  gap  in  our  Nation’s  ability  to  send  humans  into  space? 
Dr. GRIFFIN. Assuming that commercial capability does not mate-
rialize, and that we have only government capability, then it would 
be at least 4 years. Personally—I mean, we—that calls for a conclu-
sion of the witness, because we can only really assess the strategic 
impact  by  looking  back  on  it,  not  looking  forward  to  it.  But,  as  I 
look  forward  to  it,  my  conclusion  is  that,  first  of  all,  the  United 
States  will  be,  as  a  Nation,  in  a  position  of  purchasing  crew  and 
cargo  services  from  other  governments—Russia,  Europe,  Japan—
because our existing barter arrangements for the Space Station did 
not  ever  contemplate  the  lack  of  availability  of  the  Shuttle.  So,  we 
are purchasing extra services, which they are not obligated to pro-
vide.  I  will  tell  you  that  I  find  it  unseemly  for  the  United  States 
to be in a position where we must do such a thing. 

Now, we have reached the point where that is the state of affairs, 
and  so,  my  finding  it  unseemly  does  not  alter  that  fact.  But  it  is 
a  fact.  I  don’t  like  it.  I  think  it  is  an  improper  position  for  the 
world’s leading spacefaring nation to be in. Moreover, to be in such 
a  position  greatly  reduces  any  bargaining  power  we  might  have  in 
what  is  a  very  limited  marketplace,  so  we  should  not  expect  the 
cost of purchasing such services to be cheap. The money then spent 
on  purchasing  such  services  goes  to  the  aerospace  industries  of 
other nations, rather than our own. 

That can’t cheer anyone up. 
Senator  NELSON.  No.  Why  did  NASA,  to  begin  with,  decide  that 

there was going to be a gap until 2014? 

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  Sir,  we  have  a  budget.  It  is  a  very  good  budget  in 
any sense that one can assess it in the suite of domestic nondefense 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:31 Jun 08, 2007 Jkt 034851 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34851.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

32

discretionary  programs  in  the  Nation.  The  President’s  request  for 
NASA is incredibly generous. But the money only goes so far, and, 
as  you  know  we  have  many  legacy  commitments  on  Shuttle  and 
Station, which none of us want to see abrogated, between now and 
Fiscal Year 2010, that leaves a very limited amount of development 
money to nurture the new systems. The way that development pro-
grams  work  is,  for  a  fixed  amount  of  money,  the  normal  develop-
ment  program  profile  would  require  more  money,  earlier  rather 
than  later.  The  early  years  for  Orion  and  Ares  are  exactly  the 
years  when  we  have  less  money.  And  so,  given  the  fact  that  we 
have  a  generous  budget,  but  given  the  fact  that  we  have  legacy 
commitments  between  now  and  the  end  of  2010,  we  simply  do  not 
have  the  money  available  to  provide  an  early  capability  for  Orion 
and Ares. 

Senator  NELSON.  Why  don’t  you,  in  addition  to  the  figures  that 
you’re  already  going  to  supply  to  the  Committee,  supply  us  with 
the  figures  that  you  think  would  get  us  back  onto  a  track  to  have 
it  fly  in  human  flight?  Because  you’re  going  to  do  several  un-
manned flights prior. 

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  We  will  do  a  couple  of  unmanned  test  flights  prior 

to putting people onboard, yes, sir. 

Senator NELSON. So, human flight being the target of 2014, 2013, 

and 2012. 

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  So,  you  want  funding  requirements  to  provide  first 
human  launch  in—IOC,  we’re  calling  it,  Initial  Operational  Capa-
bility—you  want  funding  requirements  for  IOC  in  2012,  2013,  and 
2014. 

Senator  NELSON.  Since  you  just  announced  to  us  that  it’s  going 

to be early Fiscal Year 2015. 

Dr. GRIFFIN. At best, at this point. Yes, sir, we will get you those 

funding requirements. 

[The information referred to follows:]

Assessment of Orion Crew Exploration Vehicle Schedule 

Based on the technical baseline and flight tests planned for the Orion Crew Explo-
ration Vehicle and the Ares I Crew Launch Vehicle and the current projected budget 
available  for  Constellation  Systems,  NASA’s  estimate  for  the  CEV  Initial  Oper-
ational  Capability  (IOC)  is  March  2015,  with  a  schedule  variance  around  this  IOC 
date  of  approximately  4  months  based  on  NASA’s  cost  estimates.  This  CEV  IOC 
date  assumes  that  NASA’s  proposal  to  terminate  certain  Exploration  Systems 
projects  in  FY  2007  and  the  outyears  (approximately  $630  million  between  FY 
2007–2011)  will  be  approved,  so  that  we  may  shore  up  funding  for  the  CEV  and 
CLV.  Further,  this  projected  IOC  date  is  based  on  the  NASA  Exploration  Systems 
budget  resources  not  eroding  below  the  current  5-year  runout  or  being  re-directed 
to  other  activities.  Initial  Operational  Capability  (IOC)  for  the  Orion  and  Ares  I 
launch vehicle is defined here as the major milestone when test pilot astronauts fly 
the CEV for the first time to the International Space Station to conduct full-up test-
ing of the new spacecraft. This is not planned to be a crew rotation flight. The sec-
ond major milestone is Full Operational Capability (FOC) when the Orion Crew Ex-
ploration Vehicle and Ares I Crew Launch Vehicle will transport crew to the Inter-
national  Space  Station,  remain  at  the  Station  for  up  to  180  days,  and  then  safely 
return  a  crew  to  Earth.  This  FOC  is  projected  to  occur  approximately  1  year  fol-
lowing IOC of the Orion and Ares I. 

NASA  was  asked  to  examine  how  much  in  budget  resources  would  be  necessary 
to  meet  earlier  CEV  IOC  milestone  dates,  and  the  following  is  NASA’s  estimate  of 
three scenarios based on the assumptions noted herein. 

CEV IOC in 2012—Because of earlier decisions in response to funding limitations, 
a  CEV  IOC  milestone  is  no  longer  technically  achievable  in  2012.  In  2005,  in  an 
effort to preserve a 2012 IOC, NASA was considering a Block-1 version of the Crew 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:31 Jun 08, 2007 Jkt 034851 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34851.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

33

Launch  Vehicle,  which  utilized  the  standard  4-segment  Shuttle  Reusable  Solid 
Rocket  Booster  (RSRB)  and  a  modified,  air-start  version  of  the  Space  Shuttle  Main 
Engine  on  the  second  stage.  The  use  of  the  Block-1  CLV  would  have  preserved  the 
2012  IOC,  but  at  a  higher  overall  life-cycle  cost  for  the  Constellation  Program. 
NASA  planned  a  later  upgrade  to  a  Block-2  CLV,  with  a  5-segment  RSRB  and  J–
2X upper stage engine, both of which are essential elements for the lunar Cargo Lift 
Vehicle  (CaLV),  but  which  could  not  be  available  for  use  in  2012.  The  use  of  these 
common elements across the architecture minimizes life-cycle cost. By late 2005, be-
cause of funding reductions to the Constellation Program to support the Space Shut-
tle and the International Space Station, it became clear that funds to support devel-
opment of CEV and CLV by 2012 would not be available. Thus, in order to minimize 
life-cycle cost, in early 2006 NASA chose to proceed directly to the J–2X upper stage 
and 5-segment RSRB, which again are common to both the CLV and CaLV. In order 
to develop and test these components of the CLV, the earliest technically achievable 
CEV IOC milestone is June 2013. 

CEV IOC in 2013—In order to meet a CEV IOC of September 2013, NASA would 
require  additional  funding  in  Fiscal  Years  2008–2010  to  meet  that  IOC  schedule 
with  a  65  percent  cost  confidence  level  in  our  budgeting.  The  ideal  time-phasing  of 
such funds would be approximately $400 million in FY 2008 and an additional $1.6 
billion  in  FY  2009–2010.  The  schedule  variance  around  the  September  2013  IOC 
date is approximately 4 months, based on NASA’s cost estimates. 

CEV IOC in 2014—In order to meet a CEV IOC of September 2014, NASA would 
require additional funds in Fiscal Years 2008–2010 to meet that IOC schedule with 
a  65  percent  cost  confidence  level  in  our  budgeting.  The  ideal  time-phasing  of  such 
funds would be approximately $350 million in FY 2009 and an additional $400 mil-
lion  in  FY  2010,  though  funding  from  FY  2008  may  be  obligated  in  FY  2008–2009 
to  the  CEV  and  CLV  development.  The  schedule  variance  around  the  September 
2014 IOC date is approximately 4 months, based on NASA’s cost estimates.

Senator NELSON. OK. Is the Administration’s FY 2008 budget re-
quest sufficient to support full implementation of the missions rec-
ommended  by  the  National  Academy’s  decadal  survey  in  Earth 
science? 

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  On  what  time-scale,  sir?  I  want  to  be  very  clear 
with the addition of Earth sciences to this practice, we now obtain, 
from  the  National  Academy  of  Sciences,  decadal  surveys  in  all  of 
our  four  portfolios.  I’m  very  pleased  about  that.  I  was  one  of  the 
people  requesting  such  a  decadal  from  the  Earth  science  commu-
nity.  Now,  we  never  have  had  enough  money  to  do  all  of  the  mis-
sions in any of the decadals. So, practically speaking, we have mis-
sions  in  the  flow  in  any  of  those  areas  to  address  the  top  two  or 
three  or  four  missions.  We  absolutely  will  prioritize  our  money  in 
Earth  science  to  address  the  decadal  survey  priorities  in  Earth 
science, but we will never have enough money to address all of the 
priorities for Earth science. 

Senator  NELSON.  Is  it  correct  that  in  order  to  meet  their  rec-

that. 

ommendations, it was basically about $2 billion annually? 

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  I  don’t  know.  I  would  have  to  get  back  to  you  on 

[The information referred to follows:]
According to the Decadal Survey, the authors believed that the program they rec-
ommended  could  be  substantially  accomplished  for  a  total  NASA  Earth  science  an-
nual budget of $2 billion in constant FY 2007 dollars. We are using the detailed cost 
and  programmatic  expertise  available  to  NASA  to  examine  whether  all  of  the  tech-
nical  challenges  and  implementation  costs  associated  with  their  recommended  pro-
gram were captured in this figure. 

From  Earth  Science  and  Applications  from  Space:  National  Imperatives  for  the 
Next  Decade  and  Beyond:  ‘‘The  overall  cost  to  implement  the  recommended  NASA 
program  (∼$7  billion  over  twelve  years  for  the  15  missions)  is  estimated  to  exceed 
currently  projected  program  resources.’’  The  report  also  states  that  ‘‘The  committee 
sees  the  need  for  a  rapid  growth  in  the  NASA  Earth  Science  budget  from  approxi-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:31 Jun 08, 2007 Jkt 034851 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34851.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

34

mately $1.5 billion per year to $2 billion per year beginning in 2008 and ending no 
later than 2010.’’

NASA  is  embarking  on  an  aggressive  series  of  concept  studies,  to  look  carefully 
at  the  notional  missions  that  were  endorsed,  especially  the  early,  highest-priority 
ones from the Decadal Survey. The objectives of these studies are to understand the 
technological  challenges  inherent  in  getting  the  measurements  that  were  identified 
by the Decadal Survey, and the full costs of these missions including the launch ve-
hicle and especially also the science and the validation. We expect that in 6 months, 
we will have relatively accurate estimates of the full costs of those missions.

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  I  think  there  was  a  strong  feeling  among  those  of 
us who looked at it, that the projected cost of those missions in the 
decadal  was  substantially  underestimated,  a  not-uncommon  prac-
tice,  by  the  way.  When  we  get  a  decadal  survey,  we  pay  great  at-
tention  to  the  priority  order.  Frankly,  the  National  Academies  of 
Sciences  is  not  the  best  body  to  estimate  what  the  cost  of  those 
missions  is  likely  to  be,  and,  in  fact,  the  track  record  of  history 
would indicate that they are among the least qualified bodies to es-
timate what the cost of those missions would be. 

Senator  NELSON.  In  other  words,  you’re  saying  that  they  under-

estimate the cost. 

Dr. GRIFFIN. Correct. 
So,  we  respect  their  priorities.  We  do  not  necessarily  believe  the 

funding estimates they provide. 

Senator  NELSON.  But  the  White  House’s  budget  goes  the  other 
way,  because  they  are  estimating  this  to  be  at  $2  billion  for  each 
year, and the President’s budget requests 11⁄2 billion dollars. 

Dr. GRIFFIN. That’s correct, sir. Each of the other scientific port-
folios which we have would also request more money for their port-
folio  than  is  available.  Again,  science—I  must  remind  the  Com-
mittee,  science  today  is  funded  at  a  historic  high  within  NASA.  It 
is  32  percent  of  our  overall  funding  for  FY  2008,  the  President  is 
requesting five and a half billion dollars. That is a historic high in 
both  categories.  Earth  science  is  getting  27  percent  of—more  than 
one-fourth—of  a  science  mission  directorate  with  four  major  port-
folios.  So,  unless  the  Nation  chooses  to  allocate  substantially  more 
money  to  NASA,  and  substantially  more  money  to  science,  Earth 
science is getting its share and a little bit more. 

Senator  NELSON.  All  right.  Let’s  talk  about  another  program, 
NPOESS. This was polar orbiting satellites that are run by NOAA 
and  the  Air  Force  with  NASA’s  participation.  What  are  we  going 
to  do  to  recover  the  client  measurement  capabilities  lost  from 
NPOESS due to Nunn-McCurdy? 

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  Well,  we  will  be  relying  on  the  NPP,  the  NPOESS 
Preparatory  Project.  We  have  the  Landsat  Data  Continuity  Mis-
sion, which will fly. Frankly, we are going to have to look at other 
missions in the future to make up for the descoping of NPOESS fol-
lowing the Nunn-McCurdy breach. So, we have some scrambling to 
do, to make up for the loss of climate research from NPOESS. 

Senator NELSON. Can you fly some of those instruments on other 

Dr. GRIFFIN. Well, of course, the instruments, sir, don’t exist, so, 
can  we  fly  instruments  that  would  accomplish  what  those  instru-
ments  would  have  accomplished  on  other  satellites?  Yes.  But,  of 
course,  that  represents  a  funding  requirement  that  we  don’t  have. 

satellites? 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:31 Jun 08, 2007 Jkt 034851 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34851.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

35

Senator  NELSON.  All  right.  Let  me  ask  you  something  that  you 
can  easily  answer.  And  I’ll  state,  preparatory  to  my  question  to 
you, thank you for what you’ve done in the agency in stopping this 
muzzling  of  scientists.  Can  you  give  assurance  to  the  Committee 
that  the  actions  that  you  have  taken,  and  the  policies  that  you’ve 
implemented  to  make  sure  there’s  free  flow  of  communication  of 
scientific information from the NASA scientists, that those policies 
and procedures are in place? 

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  Yes,  sir,  I  can.  I  think  people  have,  on  many  occa-
sions, stated that the technical and scientific communication policy 
that we have outlined for the agency—people have stated that they 
believe it should be a model. I’m quite proud of it. We place no re-
strictions on what people say. In fact, looking back in the past, I’m 
not able to find cases where we did. But, leaving aside the interpre-
tation of history by disputing parties, I can assure you that we are 
absolutely not, and will not, restrict the ability of anybody working 
at NASA to express their technical opinion. 

Senator  NELSON.  I  want  to  thank  you,  personally,  for  what 

you’ve done to try to straighten that out. 

Let’s  go  back  to  the  Space  Station.  Yesterday,  the  Space  Station 
Independent Safety Task Force released a report with the following 
recommendation: ‘‘The International Space Station program should 
place  the  highest  priority  on  options  to  decrease  the  risk  of  micro-
meteoroid  and  orbital  debris.’’  Tell  us  about  this,  given  the  fact 
that,  much  to  the  chagrin  of  a  lot  of  folks,  the  Chinese  have  just 
put a bunch of debris up there with their ASAT test. 

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  Yes,  sir.  Well,  certainly,  we  agree  with  the  rec-
ommendation. That was a very good committee, and, in general, we 
are  in  consonance  with  their  recommendations.  With  regard  to  de-
bris, let me put some numbers on it. This is a nice, round number, 
but  it’s  approximately  right.  Each  day,  there  is  about  a  1-in-
100,000 chance that the International Space Station will be fatally 
damaged by a piece of orbital debris. You will appreciate that that’s 
not a large risk, but it is substantial; and, of course, it adds up over 
time. We do fly specific orientations of the Station intended to min-
imize such concerns. We have, in the past, done collision-avoidance 
maneuvers  when  a  particular  piece  of  debris  catalogued  on  radar 
tracking  posed  a  threat.  So,  we  do  pay  attention  to  orbital  debris, 
quite carefully. 

The Chinese ASAT test temporarily just about doubled that risk. 
So,  a  daily  risk  of  1-in-100,000  went,  for—we  can  argue  about  the 
time  period—let  me  just  say,  a  couple  of  weeks.  So,  for  a  few 
weeks,  the  Chinese  ASAT  test  approximately  doubled  that  risk. 
Now,  we,  at  NASA,  have,  I  will  say  with  some  pride,  the  best  or-
bital-debris  analysts  in  the  world.  It  happens  to  be  a  subject  I 
know more than a passing amount about. I have asked them about 
all  that.  Our  current  debris  risk  from  the  Chinese  ASAT  test  has 
now,  at  this  point,  receded  into  the  background.  The  longer-term 
effects  of  the  Chinese  ASAT  test  are  now  indistinguishable  from 
the  1-in-100,000  background  level  that  we  have.  At  this  point,  I 
cannot  sit  here  and  say,  technically,  that  that  is  a  concern  any-
more. The period of concern has abated. Certainly, any addition to 
the  orbital-debris  environment  by  any  nation  for  any  reason  is  not 
to  be  countenanced.  It’s  something  we  don’t  want  to  do.  There  has 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:31 Jun 08, 2007 Jkt 034851 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34851.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

36

been  for  20,  and  more,  years,  considerable  activity  through  multi-
national  bodies,  including  the  United  Nations,  seeking  to  control 
and  mitigate  debris.  We  want  that  to  continue.  We,  at  NASA,  are 
a major part of such discussions. But currently, the specific test to 
which you refer, the threat from that test has receded. 

Senator  NELSON.  Well,  the  Chinese  are  going  to  hear  that,  and 
they’re  going  to  say,  ‘‘Well,  see?  We  haven’t  appreciably  added  to 
the  problem.’’  But,  in  fact,  with  all  that  debris,  as  a  result  of  the 
Chinese  ASAT  collision  with  an  old  Chinese  weather  satellite,  as 
it descends how does that, over time, how does that lessen the dou-
bling of that probability of a strike? 

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  Because  the  debris  is  greatly  dispersed  throughout 
low  orbital  space.  The  debris  is  most  threatening  to  the  Station  or 
a  Shuttle  or  an  EVA  astronaut  when  it  is  concentrated  imme-
diately after the test. If we get through that initial more dangerous 
period, and it has time to disperse, as it naturally does, then it be-
comes statistically much less of a threat. I don’t want my remarks 
to be interpreted as a ho-hum, that it’s OK to create debris. In fact, 
I  specifically  said  that  we  don’t  want  to  create  debris,  and  we,  at 
NASA, are part of multinational coordinating bodies to prevent ex-
actly that. But with regard to the specific test that you cite, I have 
to tell the technical truth, as best we can tell, the immediate post-
tests  effects  of  debris—we  got  by  those  effects,  and  the  situation 
has  now  receded  to  the  point  where  the  Chinese  debris  has  re-
treated into the background with the other debris. 

Senator NELSON. Isn’t it true, with those additional thousands of 
pieces of debris in orbit, that fuel will have to be expended in order 
to  have  some  way  of  maneuvering  out  of  the  way  of  some  of  those 
pieces that you’re tracking? 

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  That  could  happen.  We  have  done  it  before,  for 

other pieces of debris, and it could happen again. 

Senator  NELSON.  And  that  could  happen  on  all  the  weather  sat-
ellites  and  other  surveillance  satellites  that  are  up  in  orbit,  owned 
by many nations. 

Dr. GRIFFIN. Certainly. Absolutely, sir. That is a primary reason 
why we seek to mitigate the critic—to mitigate the creation of any 
additional debris. 

Senator NELSON. Do you know, from your present tracking of the 

debris, when that maneuvering might have to occur? 

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  We  don’t  project  any  immediate  need  to  do  so.  But 
our  ability  to  project  out  more  than,  you  know,  weeks  and  months 
at  a  time  is  severely  limited.  It  is  not  knowable  in  advance,  which 
is why we continue to track—because we wish to avoid an unpleas-
ant surprise. 

Senator  NELSON.  NASA’s  outside  auditors  have  been  unable  to 
certify  NASA’s  financial  statements.  And  you  now  have  this  new 
accounting system, and there are continuing reports of problems at 
the  field  centers  with  the  new  accounting  system.  What  are  you 
proposing to try to straighten this out? 

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  I  would  want  to  distinguish  between  our  new  ac-
counting  rules,  which  have  been  welcomed  by  everybody,  and  the 
problems  with  our  audit  and  finance,  which  is  looked  upon  favor-
ably  by  nobody.  We  are  still,  overall,  red  from  our  auditors.  We 
have  made  strides.  We  have  hugely  improved  the  issue  we  once 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:31 Jun 08, 2007 Jkt 034851 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34851.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

37

had  of  funds  balance  with  the  Treasury.  We’ve  hugely  improved 
our  auditing  of  environmental  funds  and  environmental  cleanup 
and all of that. It has been said that we are now in a green, yellow, 
and  red  scale,  we’ve  moved  out  of  red,  we’re  in  yellow,  and  we’re 
headed for green in those areas. So, that’s good news. 

We’ve  made  great  strides  in  creating  a  single  agency-wide  ac-
counting  system  with  all  ten  centers,  plus  headquarters,  operating 
on  the  same  rules  of  the  road.  That  is  software  development  work 
in process by the contractor, but it is going well. 

Where  we  are  still  deficient  is  in  property  management.  In  the 
old  days,  there  was  far  less  accounting  for  the  disposition  of  prop-
erty  than  one  would  prefer.  It  is  nearly  impossible  to  go  back  and 
historically  fix  that.  So,  our  effort  is  being  put  on  correctly  cata-
loguing and locating, knowing the disposition of all property which 
is coming into the agency, and which will come into the agency. 

Our  own  Audit  and  Finance  Committee  on  our  Advisory  Council 
recently quizzed our auditors on exactly those same points. I think, 
what might only be characterized as a fulsome discussion, and they 
agreed  that  we  have  a  good  ways  to  go.  We’re  looking  at  2009  as 
being  a  point  by  which  time  you  would  be  able  to  look  at  it  and 
see considerable improvement. 

Senator  NELSON.  Do  you  think  that  NASA  will  pass  its  audits 

Dr. GRIFFIN. No. 
Senator NELSON. So, it’s 2009. 
Dr. GRIFFIN. FY 2009 is what we’re shooting for, best case. 
Senator  NELSON.  Back  to  the  question  of  the  gap,  because  this 
is obviously going to be the news item that comes out of this hear-
ing  today.  I  want  to  point  out  to  those  that  are  listening  that  the 
Administrator  has  said  early  Fiscal  Year  2015,  which  could  be  at 
the end of calendar year 2014. 

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  December  2014  would  be  the  very  best  case  we’re 

this year? 

looking at right now. 

Senator NELSON. Of 2014. 
Dr.  GRIFFIN.  Correct,  which  is  early  Fiscal  Year  2015.  That 
would  be  the  very  best  we’re  looking  at.  When  money  is  extracted 
from the program, either there needs to be less content or the dates 
will slip. 

Senator NELSON. I have another question, though. 
Dr. GRIFFIN. Yes, sir. 
Senator NELSON. And that is that you are going to pick up some 
efficiencies by virtue of the fact that your selection of the contractor 
for the CEV is going to have some savings and efficiencies by doing 
a  number  of  the  assemblies  of  the  new  CEV  there  at  the  Kennedy 
Space Center. That should lessen some of the impact on that work 
force there. 

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  Yes,  Lockheed  Martin,  the  winning  contractor  for 
the  Orion  CEV,  did,  as  part  of  their  proposal,  that  proposal  was 
made, subject to the assumption that they would be doing assembly 
in Florida. As I think you know, we, just within the last few weeks, 
turned what we call the O&C building, the Operations and Check-
out building on Kennedy Space Center, which was used for Shuttle 
processing—we  just  recently  turned  that  over  to  Orion  processing, 
that  was  a  real  milestone  for  us.  We’re  building  a  new  vehicle  for 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:31 Jun 08, 2007 Jkt 034851 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34851.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

38

the  first  time  now  in  decades.  That  certainly  will  help  the  work-
force  around  the  Kennedy  Space  Center,  as  it  was  designed  to  do. 
There are, however, no increased efficiencies in that move which 
are going to help with the calendar slippage, because the Lockheed 
bid  was  provided,  subject  to  the  assumption—they  had  already 
factored into their bid the fact of assembly in Florida, so there’s no 
additional  efficiency  to  be  obtained  over  that  which  they  provided 
in their winning bid. 

Senator  NELSON.  But  there  are  jobs  that  will  be  provided  that 
otherwise  wouldn’t  have  had  the  selection  of  that  particular  con-
tractor not been made. 

Dr. GRIFFIN. Absolutely. 
Senator  NELSON.  OK.  Now,  the  President’s  Council  on  Integrity 
and  Efficiency  has  just  sent  you  a  report  on  the  conduct  of  the 
NASA  inspector  general.  When  will  you  brief  this  Committee  on 
the  results  of  that  investigation  and  your  proposed  corrective  ac-
tions? 

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  When  the  investigation  is  complete,  sir.  There  is  a 
very formal process through which we must work, in which I must 
work. We are at the stage of that process where they have provided 
to  me  the  assessment  of  the  Integrity  Committee.  I  am  now  re-
quired  to  assess  that  report  and  to  propose  corrective  actions. 
Those  corrective  actions  go  back  to  the  White  House  and  to  the 
chairman of the Integrity Committee, and they are then forwarded 
to  that  Integrity  Committee  for  their  assessment  and  comment. 
When  that  process  is  complete,  a  redacted—meaning  personal  in-
formation has been extracted—a redacted version of the report can 
be made available to the Congress. 

Senator  NELSON.  It  seems  that  that  language  that  sets  up  the 
process  you  just  described  is  a  little  vague.  And  this  Committee  is 
quite interested in receiving that report, and receiving it in a time-
ly fashion. 

Dr. GRIFFIN. Yes, sir. 
Senator  NELSON.  Although  this  is  not  something  that’s  in  your 
hands,  because  you’ve  just  stated  the  process,  you  have  60  or  90 
days with which to review this thing before you send it back, under 
the  present  procedures.  This  Committee  isn’t  going  to  wait  around 
very  long,  because  of  information  that  we  have  received  ex  parte 
about  the  subject  of  this  investigation.  I  would  encourage  you  to 
move  with  deliberate  speed  so  that  we  can  see,  and  the  people’s 
representatives on this Committee can do our own examination, by 
receiving  that  report.  If  that  thing  gets  drug  out,  we’re  going  to 
have to do our own investigation. 

Dr. GRIFFIN. I understand, sir. I have, actually, 30 days, with the 
possibility  of  a  30-day  extension.  I  am  trying  to,  and  fully  intend 
to, return my proposed corrective actions within the 30-day period. 
Then,  they  will,  as  I  say,  go  back  to  the  White  House  for  appro-
priate disposition under the executive order dealing with the Integ-
rity Committee. 

I  do  not  have  it  within  my  power  to  decide  to  release  the  report 
to  you.  I  do  have  it  within  my  power  to  expedite  my  handling  of 
the report. And I am doing that. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:31 Jun 08, 2007 Jkt 034851 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34851.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

39

Senator  NELSON.  And  we  thank  you  for  that,  Dr.  Griffin.  It’s 
been  a  rather  detailed  and  extensive  hearing,  and  we  appreciate 
your expertise. 

The meeting is adjourned. 
[Whereupon, at 4:12 p.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:31 Jun 08, 2007 Jkt 034851 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34851.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:31 Jun 08, 2007 Jkt 034851 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34851.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

A P P E N D I X

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 
The  National  Aeronautics  and  Space  Administration’s  missions  are  vital  and  im-
portant  to  our  understanding  of  the  Universe  and  to  improving  our  existence  on 
Earth. 

NASA’s  dilemma  is  deciding  which  exciting  projects  to  tackle  first.  The  agency 
must  maintain  its  strong  legacy  in  science,  aeronautics,  education,  and  human 
spaceflight  while  preparing  for  the  future  through  recapitalizing  the  human 
spaceflight program with new vehicles, and longer flights. 

Whether  we  are  talking  about  the  International  Space  Station  or  the  Moon,  the 
biggest challenge is getting there and returning home safely. I look forward to hear-
ing  more  about  the  planning  and  development  activities  that  NASA  is  undertaking 
to  ensure  a  smooth  transition  from  the  Space  Shuttle  to  the  Orion  and  Ares,  along 
with associated cargo systems. 

We also must keep the commitments we have made to our international partners, 
particularly  Japan  and  Europe.  The  international  community  is  relying  on  the 
United  States  to  honor  its  commitments  to  the  Space  Station  program.  Those  com-
mitments  are  not  only  for  assembly  but  also  for  utilization.  We  cannot  achieve  our 
plans  for  exploration  of  the  Solar  System  if  we  go  it  alone,  and  our  performance 
today will impact our ability to recruit partners for the future. 

Ultimately, the Nation and this Congress choose to invest in a space program not 
because  we  dream  of  far  off  planets  but  because  we  want  to  leave  Earth  a  better 
place to live. Beyond the spin-off technology that the space program has developed, 
NASA satellites help us understand the Earth’s changing climate and its impact on 
humans. While the agency restored some funding to Earth science in the President’s 
FY  2008  budget  request,  I  am  dismayed  that  the  request  significantly  cuts  NASA’s 
investment in the interagency Climate Change Science Program. 

I  look  forward  to  examining  these  issues  today  along  with  the  Subcommittee’s 
new Chair, Senator Bill Nelson, who knows first hand of NASA’s importance to U.S. 
technological leadership and competitiveness.

Æ

(41)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:31 Jun 08, 2007 Jkt 034851 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34851.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

